Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1331.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2025-2026.Section 2. Total authorizations.(a) Public improvements.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 3 and to be acquired or 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $22,393,910,000 $22,525,410,000.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects itemized in section 4 and to be acquired by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $654,994,000.(c) Transportation assistance.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects itemized in section 5 with respect to which an interest is to be acquired in or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $1,808,850,000 $1,884,350,000.(d) Redevelopment assistance.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of redevelopment capital projects itemized in section 6 for capital grants by the Department of Community and Economic Development, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $6,143,330,500 $13,034,265,000.(e) Flood control.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of flood control projects itemized in section 7 and to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $109,900,000.(f) Fish Fund and Boat Fund.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of public improvement 20250HB1331PN2389 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects itemized in section 8 to be acquired or developed by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorization shall be $199,400,000 $208,900,000.Section 3. Itemization of public improvement capital projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture(i) Pennsylvania State University College of Agricultural Sciences, Centre County(A) Plant Science Facility to allow for cross-disciplinary innovation and research, including research facility, greenhouse, head house and climate-controlled plant production featuresProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Animal Diagnostic Laboratory construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 6,127,000(ii) Livestock Evaluation Center, Centre 20250HB1331PN2389 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) New Bolton Center, Chester County(A) Construction of Pennsylvania Equine Toxicology and Research Laboratory on New Bolton Campus of The University of PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 20,000,000(iv) Annex, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 8,000,000(v) Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County(A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 35,000,000(vi) Headquarters, Veterinary Laboratory and Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County(A) Upgrade security system and camerasProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Entomology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land 20250HB1331PN2389 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisitionProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Greenhouse and Nematology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 10,000,000(ix) Animal Health Diagnostic Laboratory(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvements for design and construction to satisfy modern testing proceduresProject Allocation 75,500,000(x) Headquarters, Department of Agriculture, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources(i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Portal bridge replacement and park sidewalk rehabilitation and ADA improvementsProject Allocation 3,750,000(B) Construct new parking facilities, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 park office, rehabilitate flag bastion area and install solar arraysProject Allocation 14,000,000(ii) Blue Knob State Park, Bedford County(A) Rehabilitation of Blue Knob Ski area, including improved facilities, parking, roadway and viewscapes to promote year-round recreationProject Allocation 25,000,000(iii) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Visitor center, park office and site rehabilitationProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) Gallitzin State Forest, Cambria County(A) Construct new district officeProject Allocation 12,000,000(v) Elk State Forest, Cameron County(A) Replace Brooks Run forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 3,750,000(B) Hicks Run Forest maintenance headquarters and five-bay pole buildingProject Allocation 1,250,000(v.1) Glen Onoko, Carbon County(A) Design and build the trail system at Glen OnokoProject Allocation 7,000,000(vi) Forest Fire Protection, Centre County(A) Construct new regional air operations 20250HB1331PN2389 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilityProject Allocation 3,750,000(vi.1) Mira Lloyd Dock Conservation Center, Centre County(A) Repairs to Penn Nursery Dam or Breach Dam and construct alternative water supply for irrigation systemProject Allocation 4,000,000(vii) Penn Nursery, Centre County(A) Construct new seed extraction buildingProject Allocation 1,250,000(viii) Sproul State Forest, Centre County(A) Replace Snowshoe maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 2,500,000(ix) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) State park development phase 2 and land acquisitionProject Allocation 17,500,000(x) Moshannon State Forest, Clearfield County(A) Demolish Dague Mechanics Shop and replace with modern mechanics shopProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Repairs to Shaggers Inn DamProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Parker Dam State Park, Clearfield County(A) Dam repairs and lake dredgingProject Allocation 11,250,000(xii) Bald Eagle State Forest, Clinton County20250HB1331PN2389 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construct new wood shop, groomer storage and pole storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xiii) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 35,000,000(xiv) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Construct a new headquarters building for the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 30,000,000(xv) Presque Isle State Park, Erie County(A) Sand nourishmentProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Dune replacement and resource workProject Allocation 12,500,000(C) Roads and multipurpose trail rehabilitationProject Allocation 8,750,000(xv.1) Laurel Caverns, Fayette County(A) Development of day-use facilities, visitor center and overnight facilities and acquisitionProject Allocation 30,000,000(xvi) Cornplanter State Park, Forest County(A) Construct new resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 7,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xvii) Michaux State Forest, Franklin County(A) Construct resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 21,500,000(B) CONSTRUCT, RENOVATE OR REDEVELOP FACILITIES IN THE MICHAUX STATE FOREST OR IN THE MONT ALTO AREA FOR A VISITOR CENTER AND/OR RESOURCE MANAGEMENT CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 21,500,000(xviii) Buchanan State Forest, Fulton County(A) Replace Sideling Hill maintenance headquarters and mechanics shopProject Allocation 2,500,000(xviii.1) Cowans Gap State Park, Fulton County(A) Rehabilitate Cowans Gap DamProject Allocation 7,000,000(xix) Ryerson State State Park, Greene County(A) Resource and recreation improvements Phase 2Project Allocation 12,500,000(xx) Yellow Creek State Park, Indiana County(A) Day use rehabilitationProject Allocation 7,500,000(xxi) Clear Creek State Forest, Jefferson County(A) New maintenance shop and equipment storageProject Allocation 1,875,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxii) Pinchot State Forest, Lackawanna County(A) Breach and remove Edgerton DamProject Allocation 1,250,000(B) Breach and remove Olyphant Dam No. 3 Project Allocation 1,875,000(xxiii) Memorial Lake State Park, Lebanon County(A) Rehabilitate damProject Allocation 14,000,000(xxiv) Forest Fire Protection, Luzerne County(A) Rebuild Hazelton Air Operations building, including site improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxv) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Construct Pinchot forest district resource management center complexProject Allocation 16,500,000(xxvi) Tiadaghton State Forest, Lycoming County(A) Construct new Waterville mechanics garage and storageProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxvii) Tuscarora State Forest, Mifflin County(A) Replace East Licking Creek forest maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxviii) Norristown Farm Park, Montgomery County20250HB1331PN2389 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Replace multiple vehicular and pedestrian bridgesProject Allocation 6,250,000(B) Transportation infrastructure and bridgesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxix) Shikellamy State Park, Northumberland County(A) Full replacement of dam and permanent causewayProject Allocation 37,500,000(xxx) Delaware State Forest, Pike County(A) Lilly Pond Dam spillway repair and replacementProject Allocation 2,250,000(xxxi) Denton Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Upgrade, rehabilitation or replacement of ski lift, lighting, equipment, parking and structures to improve operations, recreation and public safetyProject Allocation 18,400,000(xxxii) Gallitzin State Forest, Somerset County(A) Raze and replace the Babcock Forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xxxiii) Kooser State Park, Somerset County(A) Day use and dam rehabilitation20250HB1331PN2389 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 6,250,000(xxxiv) Leonard Harrison State Park, Tioga County(A) Turkey Path Trail rehabilitation and realignmentProject Allocation 3,750,000(xxxv) Tioga State Forest, Tioga County(A) Construct new maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Construct new resource management centerProject Allocation 40,000,000(xxxv.1) Prompton State Park, Wayne County(A) Construction, renovation, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for improvements to Prompton State ParkProject Allocation 750,000(xxxvi) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 17,500,000(xxxvii) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 17,500,000(xxxviii) State Parks - Statewide20250HB1331PN2389 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Upgrades and improvements to campground washhouses, utilities, site work and other amenities, including new construction, renovations and alterationsProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Rehabilitate historic structuresProject Allocation 12,500,000(C) Critical regulatory system repairs and replacements at multiple water and wastewater treatment plantsProject Allocation 12,500,000(D) New construction, renovations and alterations at roofed overnight colonies, including improvements to supporting infrastructure at multiple locationsProject Allocation 6,250,000(E) Improvements to training academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 37,500,000(F) Dam rehabilitation, lake dredging and various dam impoundmentsProject Allocation 46,000,000(G) Replacement and rehabilitation of multiple maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 12,500,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County20250HB1331PN2389 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 22,769,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Rockview, Centre County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 79,151,000(iii) State Correctional Institution at Houtzdale, Clearfield County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,040,000(iv) Quehanna Boot Camp, Clearfield County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related 20250HB1331PN2389 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,150,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,629,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 212,961,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 15,450,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) State Correctional Institution at Albion, Erie County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 27,877,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Fayette, Fayette County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 11,625,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,053,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Greene, Greene County(A) Design and construction of building 20250HB1331PN2389 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 23,945,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Huntingdon, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 18,670,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Smithfield, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 21,726,000(xiv) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related 20250HB1331PN2389 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 55,985,000(xv) Elizabethtown Training Facility, Lancaster County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 12,888,000(xvi) State Correctional Institution at Dallas, Luzerne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 34,000,000(xvii) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 96,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xviii) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,837,000(xix) State Correctional Institution at Graterford, Montgomery County(A) Demolition of facility, including code, permit, site, utility and infrastructure-related issuesProject Allocation 50,173,000(xx) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,826,000(xxi) State Correctional Institution at Coal Township, Northumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related 20250HB1331PN2389 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,543,000(xxii) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,136,000(xxiii) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 41,252,000(xxiv) State Correctional Institution at Laurel Highlands, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 22,471,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxv) State Correctional Institution at Somerset, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 30,623,000(xxvi) State Correctional Institution at Waymart, Wayne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 44,318,000(4) Department of Education(i) Department of Education Headquarters (Reserved)(ii) University of Pittsburgh(A) Building to connect the multiple mid-campus buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(B) Campuswide programmatic and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure upgrades to buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvements and/or renovation and upgrades to teaching, research, office and support space, including upgrades to mechanical, electric, plumbing and fire protection systemsProject Allocation 100,000,000(C) Existing apartment building or hotel for student housing - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(D) Former PAA building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements Project Allocation 180,000,000(E) New laboratory and classroom building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) Old Engineering Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(G) Parking garages - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 60,000,000(H) New residence hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 132,000,000(I) Space Research Coordination Center (SRCC) building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(J) Fitzgerald Fieldhouse - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements20250HB1331PN2389 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 360,000,000(K) New indoor track and band facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(L) New multisport athletic and entertainment facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvements, including extension of utilitiesProject Allocation 780,000,000(M) One Bigelow Academic Teaching and Research Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 300,000,000(N) New School of Dental Medicine building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(O) New School of Health and Rehabilitation Sciences building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New 20250HB1331PN2389 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 150,000,000(P) New School of Nursing building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(Q) New Student Union Building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(R) Track and Field Athletic Field Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(S) Trees Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development, site infrastructure improvements, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, and mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgrades20250HB1331PN2389 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 200,000,000(T) Twentieth Century Club building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development, site infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, and mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgradesProject Allocation 100,000,000(U) Western Psychiatric Hospital and Clinic (WPIC) parking garage - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development and site infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADAProject Allocation 100,000,000(V) Acquisition, demolition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the University of Pittsburgh at Titusville, including renovation and rehabilitation of existing facilities and construction of new facilities in the City of TitusvilleProject Allocation 10,000,000(W) Acquisition, demolition, infrastructure and other related costs 20250HB1331PN2389 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the University of Pittsburgh at Bradford, including renovation and rehabilitation of existing facilities and construction of new facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) The Pennsylvania State University(A) Smith Building - Altoona Campus, Blair County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for Smith Building at Penn State Altoona. In order to increase both the recruitment and retention of students, the proposed renovations will provide one-stop shopping for student support as well as provide a more-accessible and visible space for the Robert L. Smith Learning Resources Center. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be 20250HB1331PN2389 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 25,000,000(B) Atherton Street steam line crossing - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Atherton Street Steam Line Crossing at Penn State University Park. This project involves the installation of a new steam line that traverses Atherton Street and will connect West Campus with the central steam system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both 20250HB1331PN2389 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 15,000,000(C) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a chiller unit at Penn State University Park. This chiller unit will replace an existing, smaller chiller unit which will delay the need of a new chilled water plant. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the 20250HB1331PN2389 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 25,000,000(D) Demolition program - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs), and other related costs for the Demolition Program at Penn State University Park. This project involves the demolition of campus facilities. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,000(E) Electrical interconnection work - 20250HB1331PN2389 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for electrical interconnection work at Penn State University Park. This project will provide a new high-voltage, electrical interconnection between electrical substations to provide a single electrical distribution network. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 30,000,000(F) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Former Palmer Museum of Art at Penn State University Park. The general project scope is to renew the originally constructed 1971 and 1990 buildings to meet the new program which includes both general purpose classrooms and College of Arts and Architecture support spaces. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 50,000,000(G) General academic building - 20250HB1331PN2389 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general academic building at Penn State University Park. This project will include administrative areas, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms and offices. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(H) General research building - 20250HB1331PN2389 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general research building at Penn State University Park. This project will include new research laboratories, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms, offices and administration space. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(I) Greenhouses and headhouse complexes 20250HB1331PN2389 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relocation (PlantWorks) - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the relocation of the greenhouses and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University Park. The existing, on-campus greenhouses in the Curtin Road complex will be demolished and relocated to an all-new research greenhouse complex on campus. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 200,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) Hot water distribution system - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a hot water distribution system at Penn State University Park. This project will serve as the initial phase of a transition from steam-based heating to hot water-based heating. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(K) Millennium Science Complex II - University Park, Centre County. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for Millennium Science Complex II at Penn State University Park. This state-of-the-art facility will serve as the 'hub' for the Institutes for Biomedical and Health Sciences and will push the university to the forefront of biomedical research. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 340,000,000(L) Pasquerilla Spiritual Center - University Park, Centre County. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Pasquerilla Spiritual Center at Penn State University Park. The project will address both numerous building deficiencies and the maintenance backlog in the overall facility. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(M) Reclaimed water system - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a reclaimed water system at Penn State University Park. Use of a reclaimed water system will greatly reduce the demands of the University on local groundwater systems. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,500,000(N) Sackett Building Renovation - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Sackett Building at Penn State University Park. Sackett Building requires buildingwide renewal to include building and life safety system and accessibility upgrades. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,000(O) South chiller plant - heat recovery chillers - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for 20250HB1331PN2389 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 heat recovery chillers at the South chiller plant at Penn State University Park. These heat recovery chillers would add chilled water capacity and provide efficiency, energy, resiliency and operational improvements to the overall system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(P) Systems Renewal Program - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at Penn State University Park. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This project will allow the university to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across Penn State University Park. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 120,000,000(Q) Thermal Energy Storage Tank - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a thermal energy storage tank at Penn State University Park. A thermal 20250HB1331PN2389 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 energy storage tank will provide much-needed flexibility and improved infrastructure to the central chilled water system, all while saving energy and reducing the university's overall carbon footprint. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 50,000,000(R) XLP Cable Replacement Program - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the XLP Cable Replacement Program at Penn State University Park. Replacement of 20250HB1331PN2389 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the faulty, 1980s-era XLP cable is a significant safety initiative of the university. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 16,500,000(S) Classroom/Class Lab Building - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a classroom/class lab building at Penn State University Park. This project will include new classrooms, science teaching laboratories, computer labs, seminar 20250HB1331PN2389 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rooms, classroom support space and teaching auditoria. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 33,700,000(T) Systems Renewal Program - Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Dauphin County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. This project is part of a continuing effort to make significant, comprehensive upgrades to infrastructure in the College of Medicine facilities at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 30,000,000(U) Water re-use system - Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Dauphin County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a water re-use system at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. A water re-use system would treat on-site generated wastewater in order to re-use the treated water. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim 20250HB1331PN2389 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,000,000(V) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Stone Valley Forestry Building at Penn State University Park. This opportunity to erect a new, modern and efficient Stone Valley Forestry Building will certainly enhance the Forestland Management Office's ability to meet its mission, vision and strategic objectives. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim 20250HB1331PN2389 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,000,000(W) Systems Renewal Program - Statewide Campuses. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at the Commonwealth Campuses. This project will allow the University to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across the Commonwealth Campuses. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both 20250HB1331PN2389 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 60,000,000(iv) Temple University(A) Alternative energy infrastructure - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and installation of alternative energy systems, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvements at Temple's domestic campusesProject Allocation 80,000,000(B) Energy services facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 125,000,000(C) Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) Academic Building - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of 20250HB1331PN2389 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazardous materials and construction or renovation of an energy services facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 300,000,000(D) Facilities and infrastructure renewal - various campuses, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site improvements and other related costs for renovations and retrofits to improve energy efficiency, sustainability and functionality of buildings and infrastructure at domestic campusesProject Allocation 200,000,000(E) Interdisciplinary research facility - Main Campus, Health Sciences Center Campus or Ambler Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a research building, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 250,000,000(F) Klein Hall - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction of an academic/administrative building, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 185,000,000(G) Microgrid facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(H) Multiuse facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, renovations and addition to existing historical building for an adaptive reuse as a multiuse facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgrades.Project Allocation 50,000,000(I) Multiuse facility - Main Campus or Health Sciences Center Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a multiuse facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance related upgradesProject Allocation 100,000,000(J) Storm water management systems - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition and installation of storm water management systems, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvements at the Main CampusProject Allocation 50,000,000(K) Revitalization of former University of the Arts facilities - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Acquisition, design, infrastructure improvements, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition, renovations and additions to multiple facilities, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 300,000,000(v) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City 20250HB1331PN2389 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 District, Philadelphia County. Renovation and alterations to third and fourth floor, addition of exterior signage and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Campuswide fire alarm panel upgrades, Chester County. Fire panel replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing and outdated components throughout campusProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Campuswide infrastructure improvements, Chester County. Infrastructure replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing components throughout campusProject Allocation 37,500,000(D) Campuswide Security Improvements, Chester County. Active shooter hardware upgrades for building doors throughout campusProject Allocation 750,000(E) Campuswide HVAC Improvements, Chester County. HVAC replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing components throughout campusProject Allocation 856,000(F) Center for Black Culture, Chester 20250HB1331PN2389 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(G) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Heritage Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure improvements for additionProject Allocation 750,000(I) Historic District, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(J) Houston Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(K) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 30,000,000(L) Lucy Laney, Library and Amos House, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(M) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 45,570,000(N) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,250,000(O) McRary Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 33,000,000(P) Nelson Science Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction 20250HB1331PN2389 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(Q) Perimeter road, Chester County. Perimeter road reconfiguration and new guard boothProject Allocation 6,000,000(R) Physical plant, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(S) New residence hall - Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 62,500,000(T) Thurgood Marshall Living Learning Center, Chester County. HVAC replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing componentsProject Allocation 12,678,000(U) University Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements20250HB1331PN2389 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 31,250,000(V) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,250,000(vi) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Cottage and Orange Street houses, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipmentProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Griscom Learning Center and Orange Street Campus, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, HVAC improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 14,400,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Renovation, replacement and upgrade of all systems, roof, HVAC, infrastructure and interiors to standards and code, including alterations, new construction, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction20250HB1331PN2389 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 17,250,000(D) Historic Almshouse Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 24,150,000(E) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, HVAC improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 16,000,000(F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, exterior painting and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 113,000,000(G) Multipurpose activity center building, Lancaster County. Replacement and upgrade of campus athletic center roofProject Allocation 6,000,000(H) Schwalm Building Student Center, Lancaster County. Renovate existing facility to provide expanded and improved student center adjacent to planned new dormitory and dining facility20250HB1331PN2389 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 15,350,000(I) Snyder Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 22,000,000(J) Warehouse, Lancaster County. Renovations and upgrades to main central warehouse, including roof, mechanical and exterior upgradesProject Allocation 4,600,000(K) Dormitories, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, repairs, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction, including HVAC improvementsProject Allocation 36,000,000(L) Improvements, campuswide, Lancaster County. Improvements to meet current and future demands, including land acquisition, site and building infrastructure improvements, new construction, renovations, additions and building system upgrades and improvements, including associated design and constructionProject Allocation 34,000,000(M) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement and upgrade of door entrances, swipe card systems and camera monitoring systemsProject Allocation 12,000,000(N) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement of missing and outdated lighting and equipmentProject Allocation 6,000,000(O) Sidewalks and roads, campuswide, Lancaster County. Sidewalk and road repairsProject Allocation 6,000,000(vii) Beaver County Community College School of Aviation(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for hangars and facilities, classrooms and a control tower at the Beaver County Community 20250HB1331PN2389 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 College School of Aviation in Chippewa TownshipProject Allocation 3,750,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency(i) Headquarters building, Dauphin County(A) Infrastructure improvements, including replacement of electrical switch gearProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Renovations, alterations and new construction, including site improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Western Area Office, Indiana County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art emergency operations and coordination center in the western area of this Commonwealth, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(iii) State Fire Academy, Mifflin County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(iv) Special Operations Center(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land 20250HB1331PN2389 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 95,000,000(6) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Pitcairn Borough Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Dirty Camp RunProject Allocation 4,000,000(ii) Streets Run Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Streets RunProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) New Kernsville, Berks County(A) Demolition of warehouse structure and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,000(iv) Northern Cambria Borough flood control, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,400,000(v) Wilmore Borough Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) New levee project along Little Conemaugh River and North Branch of Little Conemaugh RiverProject Allocation 3,000,000(vi) Solomon Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County20250HB1331PN2389 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Saint Clair Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,000,000(viii) Sam's Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 7,000,000(ix) Pine Glen/Avery Cola Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 3,700,000(x) Alder Run/Thompson Brother Coal Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 2,700,000(xi) Fye/Larry D. Baumgardner Coal Company, Centre County(A) Construction of a chemical treatment system to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 1,350,000(xii) Timothy A. Keck/Keck 1, Clarion County(A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 1,100,000(xiii) Buck Run/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 600,000(xiv) Reed/Sky Haven Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 425,000(xv) Manor Mine/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 5,175,000(xvi) Stinky Run Flood Control Project, Clearfield County(A) Culvert projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(xvii) Big Run/Avery Coal, Clinton County(A) Rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 2,000,000(xvii.1) Rachel Carson State Office Building, Dauphin County(A) Statewide projects for space consolidation effortsProject Allocation 11,000,000(xviii) Isabella Mine Site, Fayette County(A) Comprehensive reclamation project to address land reclamation, primary 20250HB1331PN2389 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 discharge structure and conveyance channel for freshwater impoundment and AMD discharge collection and treatment systemProject Allocation 25,000,000(xix) Brockway Clay Company, Jefferson County(A) Reclamation of two abandoned noncoal mining permitsProject Allocation 1,480,000(xx) Weisner Hollow Slurry Dam Reclamation, Jefferson County(A) Regrade a stream channel and close off a coal refuse channel, including the overflow channelsProject Allocation 27,200,000(xxi) Hull Creek, Lackawanna County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxii) Roaring Brook Flood Protection Project, Lackawanna County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 11,000,000(xxiii) Ashley - Sulfur Run, Luzerne County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(xxiv) Brown Creek Flood Protection Project, Luzerne County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxv) 21st Centuramics, McKean County20250HB1331PN2389 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 2,860,000(xxvi) Port Allegany Borough Flood Control, McKean County(A) Levee projectProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxvii) Glenside Area Flood Protection Project, Montgomery County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxviii) Flat Rock Dam facilities, Philadelphia County(A) Rehabilitation of canal wall and erosion protectionProject Allocation 19,600,000(xxix) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Dewatering outfall structure for the dam and dredging/desilting of the reservoirProject Allocation 63,600,000(xxx) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Rehabilitation of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,000(xxxi) Tamaqua Dam facilities, Schuylkill County(A) Demolition of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxi.1) Elkland Borough Flood Protection Project, Tioga County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 17,000,000(xxxi.2) Harvey's Lake - Wordon Place Flood Protection Project, Tioga County(A) Rehabilitation of flood protection projectProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxxii) S&K Energy, Inc., Lounder Mine, Washington County(A) Reclamation of highwalls and revegetate the siteProject Allocation 3,220,000(xxxiii) Banning #4 and Euclid Combination Treatment Facility, Westmoreland County(A) Combination treatment facility will be constructed to eliminate the two independent facilities that maintain the underground mine poolProject Allocation 22,000,000(xxxiv) Northmont Area-Greensburg City Flood Control, Westmoreland County(A) Culvert channel and culvert improvementProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxv) Jeannette - Brush Creek, Westmoreland County(A) Rehabilitation and extension of levee and floodwall flood protection system20250HB1331PN2389 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(xxxvi) Flood Protection Reconstruction Project, Statewide(A) Reconstruction of multiple existing levee street and railroad closure projectsProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxxvii) New laboratory(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 45,500,000(7) Department of General Services(i) Pedestrian bridges, Dauphin County(A) Construction of bridges across Forster Street and 7th Street, including site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility workProject Allocation 45,000,000(i.1) State Street Bridge, Dauphin County(A) Renovations and improvement to State Street BridgeProject Allocation 50,000,000(ii) Warehouse and fleet garage(A) Construction of warehouse and garage facilities, including auxiliary support buildings, site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility work20250HB1331PN2389 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 200,000,000(iii) Statewide(A) Renovations, alterations, construction, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisition for Department of General Services-owned buildings and structuresProject Allocation 200,000,000(B) Design and construct solar panel and electric vehicle charging stations at Commonwealth facilities, including land acquisition and site and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Professional services for the development of agency facility strategic master plans and capital planningProject Allocation 40,000,000(8) Department of Health(i) Bureau of Laboratories(A) Construct new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 30,500,000(9) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) Fort Pitt, Allegheny County(A) Building, site and infrastructure 20250HB1331PN2389 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Old Economy Village, Beaver County(A) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(iii) Conrad Weiser Homestead, Berks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 1,500,000(iv) Daniel Boone Homestead, Berks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(v) Pennsbury Manor, Bucks County(A) Building, infrastructure and site improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Eckley Miners Village, Carbon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Pennsylvania Military Museum, Centre County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County20250HB1331PN2389 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 30,000,000(ix) State Archives, Dauphin County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(x) Anthracite Heritage Museum, Lackawanna County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xi) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xii) Railroad Museum of Pennsylvania, Lancaster County(A) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiii) Cornwall Iron Furnace, Lebanon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xiv) Hope Lodge, Montgomery County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xv) Joseph Priestley House, Northumberland County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvi) Pennsylvania Lumber Museum, Potter County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xvii) Somerset Historical Center, Somerset County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(xviii) Drake Well Museum, Venango County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xix) Bushy Run Battlefield, Westmoreland County(A) Building, site and infrastructure 20250HB1331PN2389 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvementsProject Allocation 7,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xx) Statewide historic sites(A) Renovations, alterations and site upgrades for long-term maintenance, ADA, code and energy improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(10) Department of Human Services(i) Wernersville State Hospital, Berks County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(ii) Western Secure Treatment Unit, Butler County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(iii) Ebensburg Center, Cambria County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land 20250HB1331PN2389 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(iv) South Mountain Restoration Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(v) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(vi) Youth Forestry Camp No. 3, Huntingdon County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(vii) Clarks Summit State Hospital, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(viii) North East Secure Treatment Unit, Luzerne County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(ix) Norristown State Hospital, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Additional funds for the design and construction of a psychiatric forensic building on existing lands of the Commonwealth at Norristown State Hospital in West Norriton Township to be utilized for the care and treatment of clients admitted to the institution Project Allocation 250,000,000(x) South East Youth Development Center, Montgomery County20250HB1331PN2389 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xi) Danville State Hospital, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xii) North Central Secure Treatment Unit, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xiii) Loysville Youth Development Center, Perry County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xiv) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County20250HB1331PN2389 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xv) Warren State Hospital, Warren County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xvi) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(11) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West 20250HB1331PN2389 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(v) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20250HB1331PN2389 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Bedford Readiness Center land, Bedford County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(vii) Berks County Readiness Centers, Berks County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 27,000,000(ix) Bucks County Readiness Centers, Bucks County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20250HB1331PN2389 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 62,000,000(x) Bucks County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Bucks County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xii) Cambria County Readiness Centers, Cambria County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 35,000,000(xiii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cambria County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) New Cambria Readiness Center, Cambria County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(xv) Lehighton Readiness Center, Carbon County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xvi) Centre County Readiness Centers, Centre County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 12,000,000(xvii) Centre County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Centre County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xviii) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xix) Chester County Readiness Centers, Chester County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xx) Chester County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Chester County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxi) Southeastern Veterans Center, Spring City, Chester County(A) Construction of new replacement Community Living Center20250HB1331PN2389 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 14,400,000(xxii) Clearfield Readiness Center, Clearfield County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxiii) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 19,000,000(xxiv) Crawford County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Crawford County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxv) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxvi) Cumberland Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxvii) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 60,000,000(xxviii) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xxix) Fayette County Readiness Centers, Fayette County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new 20250HB1331PN2389 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xxx) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxi) Indiana Readiness Center, Indiana County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxxii) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxiii) Lackawanna County Readiness Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna 20250HB1331PN2389 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxiv) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxv) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, Lancaster County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 22,000,000(xxxvi) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 65,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxvii) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 140,000,000(B) Acquisition of privately owned properties within boundaries of Fort Indiantown Gap for training and activities of the installationProject Allocation 8,000,000(C) Purchase in-holdings on Fort Indiantown Gap property and/or surrounding property for Joint Land Use agreements/Army Compatible Use Buffers, including acquisition of landProject Allocation 8,000,000(xxxviii) New Lehigh County Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxix) New Lehigh County Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xl) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xli) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, Luzerne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 75,000,000(xlii) New Luzerne County Readiness Center, Luzerne County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(xliii) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xliv) Mercer County Readiness Centers, Mercer County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(xlv) Mercer County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Mercer County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xlvi) Montgomery County Readiness Centers, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xlvii) Montgomery Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 50,000,000(xlviii) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xlix) Montour County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Montour County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(l) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(li) Philadelphia County Readiness Centers, Philadelphia County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(lii) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(liii) Friedens Readiness Center, Somerset County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(liv) Washington County Readiness Centers, Washington County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 17,000,000(lv) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(lvi) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 55,000,000(lvii) York County Readiness Centers, York County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lviii) New Central Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(lix) New Northeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness center20250HB1331PN2389 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(lx) New Southeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 30,000,000(lxi) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Feasibility study, design and construction of building upgrades. Demolition, renovation, general repairs and expansion, including land development and site infrastructure improvements of the six Veterans Homes Project Allocation 126,000,000(lxii) Military and Veterans Affairs buildings, Statewide(A) Improvements, including the addition of veterans outreach centers, to provide services in areas that have demonstrated the greatest needProject Allocation 21,000,000(12) Office of Administration(i) Commonwealth Technology Center, Dauphin County(A) Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 11,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) UPS system replacement. Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 2,500,000(13) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Pennsylvania State Police Academy, Dauphin County(A) Rehabilitate the Academy complex, including site acquisition and developmentProject Allocation 163,000,000(ii) Regional forensic laboratory(A) Renovate and/or construct new laboratory in Central Pennsylvania, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 90,500,000(iii) Statewide(A) Capital renewal of facilities and new construction, including site and building improvements, interior renovations, building system upgrades, code-required improvements, security enhancements such as perimeter fencing and upgrade or replacement of fueling stations, including, if applicable, establishment of electric vehicle charging stationsProject Allocation 200,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Land acquisition or purchase of facility to replace buildings or provide new facilities to further the mission of the State Police, to include exercising an option to purchase real property contained in a lease that was fully executed before the effective date of this statute, and deemed in the best interest of the Commonwealth and State PoliceProject Allocation 250,000,000(14) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructure.Project Allocation 20,000,000(B) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Bloomsburg University, Columbia County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(D) Mansfield University, Tioga County. Provide for deferred maintenance needs and capital renewal repairsProject Allocation 20,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) PennWest University(A) Clarion, Clarion County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Clarion, Clarion County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 29,000,000(C) Edinboro, Erie County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(D) Edinboro, Erie County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 23,000,000(E) California, Washington County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) California, Washington County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 30,000,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildings20250HB1331PN2389 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 30,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Old MainProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Slippery Rock University, Butler County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Eisenberg classroom buildingProject Allocation 40,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(v) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(vi) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Dudley Center for the Arts 20250HB1331PN2389 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 8,000,000(vii) Shippensburg University, Cumberland County(A) Heiges Field House renovation and additionProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,000(viii) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) New construction, alterations, and infrastructure upgrades for a new academic commons replacementProject Allocation 45,000,000(ix) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Pucillo HallProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations, and infrastructure upgradeProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus ADA infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Biemsderfer StadiumProject Allocation 8,000,000(x) East Stroudsburg University, Monroe County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Linden HallProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) State System of Higher Education, Systemwide(A) Renovations, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildingsProject Allocation 20,000,000(15) Department of Transportation(i) Adams County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility. May include site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,200,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(ii) Allegheny County(A) District Office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 11-0Project Allocation 30,800,000(B) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new, and expand, including 20250HB1331PN2389 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,400,000(C) Fleet Management (Western). New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing Western training facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(E) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility,including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,875,000(F) Maintenance facility-county office. Super garage. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility to combine the Allegheny, Beaver and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fort Pitt Tunnel maintenance units into a combined garage and administration building, including auxiliary buildings. May include site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 120,000,000(G) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Armstrong County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,850,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,200,000(iv) Beaver County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design 20250HB1331PN2389 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,450,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(v) Bedford County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 7,075,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structures20250HB1331PN2389 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 8,300,000(vi) Berks County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,775,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Weigh station. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of a Transportation/State Police inspection facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250HB1331PN2389 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 60,000,000(vii) Blair County(A) District office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 9-0Project Allocation 41,000,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 32,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,335,000(viii) Bradford County20250HB1331PN2389 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 43,425,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(ix) Bucks County(A) General storage buildings. Construct 20250HB1331PN2389 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 39,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site P, including roof replacement, building systems 20250HB1331PN2389 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,157,000(F) Welcome Center. Renovate and expand Welcome Center Site P, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 40,000,000(x) Butler County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 19,605,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Cambria County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,425,000(xii) Cameron County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,825,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xiii) Carbon County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 51,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(E) Paint truck storage building. The proposed new line painting truck maintenance building for traffic line painting operationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xiv) Centre County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250HB1331PN2389 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 1,800,000(xv) Chester County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 34,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20250HB1331PN2389 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xvi) Clarion County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,238,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xvii) Clearfield County20250HB1331PN2389 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 9,700,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xviii) Clinton County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 27,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xix) Columbia County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 8,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250HB1331PN2389 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xx) Crawford County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,650,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 4,025,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20250HB1331PN2389 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(E) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Cumberland County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 23,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxii) Dauphin County(A) Keystone Building. To provide for the 20250HB1331PN2389 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reorganization of Transportation Offices to meet changing program needsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 39,000,000(C) Fleet management facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,500,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,500,000(E) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 6,700,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) Materials testing laboratory. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,000,000(G) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 46, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(H) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 47, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(I) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 48, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(J) Sign shop facility. Construct new, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(K) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,200,000(xxiii) Delaware County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 31,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site N, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 35,450,000(xxiv) Elk County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20250HB1331PN2389 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxv) Erie County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,638,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site L, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 34,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site M, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xxvi) Fayette County(A) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 35,000,000(B) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 29,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(xxvii) Forest County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 5,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxviii) Franklin County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250HB1331PN2389 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,625,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 7,560,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site G, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,500,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 3,000,000(xxix) Fulton County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250HB1331PN2389 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,075,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 3, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site B, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250HB1331PN2389 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 22,450,000(xxx) Greene County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,100,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site D, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250HB1331PN2389 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 32,200,000(xxxi) Huntingdon County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 9,770,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxxii) Indiana County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 30,150,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 15,603,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 8,950,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,500,000(xxxiii) Jefferson County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250HB1331PN2389 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 25,350,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 25, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 26, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) Juniata County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 24,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(xxxv) Lackawanna County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 37,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,285,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 55, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxvi) Lancaster County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250HB1331PN2389 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,400,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxvii) Lawrence County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,275,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxviii) Lebanon County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Fleet management (Eastern). New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing Eastern training facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 14,925,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,150,000(xxxix) Lehigh County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 40,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,550,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide 20250HB1331PN2389 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,000,000(xl) Luzerne County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 32,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,780,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt 20250HB1331PN2389 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 3,000,000(xli) Lycoming County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 38,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,125,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xlii) McKean County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,125,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xliii) Mercer County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 17, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 18, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 2,500,000(F) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site E, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 14,225,000(xliv) Mifflin County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,325,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xlv) Monroe County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,050,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site F, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 20,500,000(xlvi) Montgomery County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,260,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,100,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Parking garage. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing parking garage at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work20250HB1331PN2389 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 14,000,000(F) Regional traffic management center. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing regional traffic management center at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 70,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xlvii) Montour County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,800,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250HB1331PN2389 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(xlviii) Northampton County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 11,500,000(xlix) Northumberland County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(l) Perry County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 40,000,000(li) Philadelphia County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250HB1331PN2389 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 25,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Design, construction and general improvements to all Philadelphia Regional Port Authority properties, including new land acquisitionProject Allocation 150,000,000PROJECT ALLOCATION 260,000,000(D) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Maintenance dredging of all Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities, including permitting activitiesProject Allocation 60,000,000(E) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Sustainability/resiliency at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 100,000,000(F) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements to include acquisition and development of infrastructure to support the handling 20250HB1331PN2389 - 148 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of both general and passenger cargo at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 160,600,000(G) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Container capacity development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 244,000,000(H) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Acquisition of Ship to Store Cranes for use at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 85,800,000(I) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Berth development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities to include capital dredgingProject Allocation 137,500,000(J) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements to the Tioga Marine Terminal infrastructure, and adjacent properties, to include berth rehabilitation, two container cranes and warehouse developmentProject Allocation 125,000,000(lii) Pike County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,800,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site K, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,850,000(liii) Potter County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 2,900,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(liv) Schuylkill County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,850,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide 20250HB1331PN2389 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(lv) Snyder County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 46,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lvi) Somerset County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including 20250HB1331PN2389 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(lvii) Sullivan County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 24,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. 20250HB1331PN2389 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lviii) Susquehanna County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 19,650,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site H, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,180,000(lix) Tioga County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 11,825,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site T, including roof replacement, building 20250HB1331PN2389 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(lx) Union County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 42,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxi) Venango County(A) District Office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code 20250HB1331PN2389 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 1-0Project Allocation 31,905,000(B) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,925,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxii) Warren County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including 20250HB1331PN2389 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,925,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,500,000(lxiii) Washington County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,250,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 7,000,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site A, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(lxiv) Wayne County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 8,600,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxv) Westmoreland County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 11,200,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,800,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(lxvi) Wyoming County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,040,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxvii) York County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 26,550,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,780,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site J, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 7,000,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 2,500,000(lxvii.1) Multicounty(A) District Office/County Maintenance Office and garage/Real ID Drivers Licensing Center, Lehigh, Carbon, Monroe, Northampton, Schuylkill and Berks Counties. Combining the District 5 Engineering Office and County Maintenance Offices in the District 5 region, including Berks, Schuylkill, Lehigh, Carbon, Monroe and Northampton County Maintenance Office and garage facilities, including associated stockpiles, into one combined facility complex, including a Real ID Driver Licensing and Vehicle Service Center, including the demolition of existing structures, construction of new district and county maintenance offices and garage facilities, Driver Licensing and Vehicle Service Center, including auxiliary support buildings. The project may include site acquisition, land development, design and construction of buildings, utility infrastructure, roadways and security 20250HB1331PN2389 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems to meet PennDOT operational needsProject Allocation 500,000,000(B) District Office, Lehigh, Carbon, Monroe, Northampton, Schuylkill and Berks Counties. Replacement of the District 5 Engineering Office, including the construction of auxiliary support buildings. The project may include site acquisition, land development, design and construction of buildings and utility infrastructureProject Allocation 100,000,000(lxviii) Statewide(A) Weigh stations. Construct new, upgrade, replace to provide for the construction or renovation of Transportation/State Police inspection facilities, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work. Construction of six facilities StatewideProject Allocation 360,000,000(B) Intercity passenger and freight rail. Rehabilitate or construct intercity passenger and freight rail infrastructure, including bridges, to accommodate current and future demands20250HB1331PN2389 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 75,000,000Section 4. Itemization of furniture and equipment projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects and to be purchased by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial cost, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture (Reserved)(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources(i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for park office renovationsProject Allocation 819,000(ii) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new resource center with storage buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(iv) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County20250HB1331PN2389 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new laboratoryProject Allocation 3,000,000(v) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new headquarters of the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 2,000,000(vi) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Pinchot Forest District resource management center complexProject Allocation 700,000(vii) Maurice K. Goddard State Park, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 750,000(viii) Denten Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 500,000(ix) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(xi) Training Academy and Range, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Bureau of State Parks Training Academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 2,000,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,050,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Rockview, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 7,500,000(iii) Quehanna Boot Camp, Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County(A) Provide original furniture and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 15,000,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Elizabethtown Training Academy, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County20250HB1331PN2389 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 8,000,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,050,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 500,000(xiv) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(xv) State Correctional Institution at Waymart, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(4) Department of Education(i) The Pennsylvania State University20250HB1331PN2389 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Smith Building - Altoona Campus, Blair County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(D) General academic building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(E) General research building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(F) Greenhouse and headhouse complexes relocation (PlantWorks) - University 20250HB1331PN2389 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Park, Centre County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for the relocation of the greenhouse and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University ParkProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Millennium Science Complex II - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 20,000,000(H) Pasquerilla Spiritual Center - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 3,000,000(I) Classroom/class lab building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 5,050,000(J) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space20250HB1331PN2389 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City District, Philadelphia County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(B) Center for Black Culture, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(C) Cresson Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 1,250,000(E) Heritage Center, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 375,000(F) Houston Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for 20250HB1331PN2389 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovationProject Allocation 4,000,000(H) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 14,000,000(I) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(J) McRary Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(K) Nelson Science Center, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 1,250,000(L) New residence hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 5,000,000(M) Physical plant, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 2,500,000(N) University Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations20250HB1331PN2389 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,000,000(O) Vail Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(P) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(iii) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Community Learning Center, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Dormitories, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(D) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(E) Leonard Hall, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 15,000,000(G) New multipurpose building/dormitory, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for additionProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Schwalm Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,500,000(I) Snyder Hall, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency (Reserved)(6) Department of Environmental Protection (Reserved)(7) Department of General Services(i) Statewide(A) Furniture, fixtures and equipment for space consolidation effortsProject Allocation 100,000,000(ii) Rachel Carson Building, Dauphin County(A) Provide new fixtures, furnishings and equipment for the Rachel Carson BuildingProject Allocation 20,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated State MuseumProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Furniture and equipment for building rehabilitationProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) State Archives, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated State Archives buildingProject Allocation 8,000,000(iii) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated Visitor CenterProject Allocation 2,000,000(9) Department of Human Services(i) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Norristown Forensic Building, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment for the Norristown Forensic BuildingProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment to support central building renovation projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(iv) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 5,000,000(10) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong 20250HB1331PN2389 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(v) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(vi) Berks County Readiness Center, Berks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) Bucks County Readiness Centers, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(ix) Bucks County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(x) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County20250HB1331PN2389 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xi) Cambria County Readiness Centers, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiii) Lehighton Readiness Centers, Carbon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiv) Centre County Readiness Centers, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiv) Centre County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvi) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County20250HB1331PN2389 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvii) Chester County Readiness Centers, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 3,000,000(xviii) Chester County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xix) Southeastern Veterans Center, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xx) Clearfield Readiness Center, Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxii) Crawford County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Crawford County20250HB1331PN2389 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiii) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiv) Cumberland County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxv) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvi) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvii) Fayette County Readiness Center, Fayette County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxviii) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County20250HB1331PN2389 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxix) Indiana Readiness Center, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxx) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxi) Lackawanna County Readiness Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxii) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiii) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence 20250HB1331PN2389 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxv) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 3,000,000(xxxvi) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxvii) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxxviii) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxix) Mercer County Readiness Centers, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xl) Mercer County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Mercer County20250HB1331PN2389 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xli) Montgomery County Readiness Centers, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlii) Montgomery County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(xliii) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xliv) Montour County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlv) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlvi) Philadelphia County Readiness Centers, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Philadelphia County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlvii) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlviii) Friedens Readiness Centers, Somerset County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlix) Washington Readiness Center, Washington County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(l) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(li) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lii) York County Readiness Centers, York County20250HB1331PN2389 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(liii) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans HomesProject Allocation 3,000,000(liv) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans HomesProject Allocation 5,000,000(11) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Original furniture and equipment for Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 3,000,000(ii) PennWest University(A) Edinboro, Erie County. Original furniture and equipment for Wiley HallProject Allocation 1,500,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Original furniture and equipment for Beekey Education BuildingProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Original furniture and equipment for Rickenbach Education BuildingProject Allocation 2,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Original furniture and equipment for Keystone Hall/fieldhouse upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 4,000,000(v) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Original furniture and equipment for Ada Georges Dining HallProject Allocation 4,100,000(vi) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Original furniture and equipment for academic buildingProject Allocation 6,800,000(vii) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Original furniture and equipment for Pucillo HallProject Allocation 1,700,000(B) Original furniture and equipment for Brooks Hall renovation to become Lombardo College of BusinessProject Allocation 1,000,000(12) Office of Administration (Reserved)(13) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20250HB1331PN2389 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000,000(14) Department of Transportation(i) Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for maintenance facilityProject Allocation 600,000Section 5. Itemization of transportation assistance projects.(a) Mass transit.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for mass transit in which an interest is to be acquired or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Allegheny County(i) Pittsburgh Regional Transit(A) Bus replacement program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses.Project Allocation 50,000,000(B) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Improvements to stations, signals, track, power, fixed guideways, bridges, tunnels, incline and operating/maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 50,000,000(C) Bus and Rail Vehicle Overhaul Program. Overhaul of existing bus and rail car assets20250HB1331PN2389 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 50,000,000(D) ITS Hardware/Software Program. Hardware and software for intelligent station real time signage, including information technology infrastructure and enterprise softwareProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) New bus operating facility. This project will provides Pittsburgh Regional Transit a new operating facility with the capacity of 230 buses, and supports both diesel and electric busesProject Allocation 236,000,000(2) Beaver County(i) Center Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and other related costs for improvements at Beaver County Transit Authority's Center Township Terminal facilityProject Allocation 1,500,000(3) Dauphin County(i) City of Harrisburg(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for the relocation of a mass transit operation within the City of Harrisburg20250HB1331PN2389 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 25,000,000(4) Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(i) Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority(A) Urbanized Area Formula Program of Projects. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or replace various facilities and infrastructure to improve the system and bring assets to a state of good repairProject Allocation 150,000,000(B) Federal State of Good Repair Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to rehabilitate or replace existing facilities, vehicles and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 220,000,000(C) Bus and Bus Facilities Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to rehabilitate or replace existing bus facilities and vehicles to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 70,000,000(D) Bus Purchase Flex Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replace various facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) Federal Grant Program. Projects include vehicle purchases and overhauls; signal system modernization; accessibility, stations and parking; new payment technologies, system improvements and state-of-good-repair initiativesProject Allocation 250,000,000(F) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 250,000,000(G) State of Good Repair Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 110,000,000(H) System Improvements Program. Improve transit service in Southeastern PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 150,000,000(b) Rural and intercity rail.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for rural and intercity rail service projects to be constructed or with 20250HB1331PN2389 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 respect to which an interest is to be acquired by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Adams County(i) Susquehanna Area Regional Airport Authority(A) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for economic development initiatives at Gettysburg Regional AirportProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Infrastructure, site work and other costs associated with the rehabilitation of existing aviation facilities and construction of new aviation facilities at Gettysburg Regional AirportProject Allocation 2,500,000(2) Beaver County(i) Beaver County Airport Authority(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for hangars and facility improvementsProject Allocation 2,500,000(ii) Chippewa Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 192 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for hangars and facilities, classrooms and a control tower at the Beaver County Community College School of AviationProject Allocation 3,750,000(3) York County(i) Susquehanna Area Regional Airport Authority(A) Infrastructure, site work and other costs associated with the rehabilitation of existing aviation facilities and construction of new aviation facilities at the Capital City Airport in Fairview TownshipProject Allocation 2,500,000(1) ALLEGHENY COUNTY(I) METALTECH(A) REHABILITATE AND EXPAND RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN ALLEGHENY COUNTY, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, RIVERBANK STABILIZATION, CULVERT REPAIR, GRADING, LOADING/UNLOADING RAMP, CRANE IMPROVEMENTS, SCALE RELOCATION, CROSSING, LUBRICATOR, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(2) BERKS COUNTY20250HB1331PN2389 - 193 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) H&K GROUP(A) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN BERKS COUNTY (DOUGLASS TOWNSHIP), INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT, ELECTRIC UTILITY RELOCATION, RETAINING WALLS, CROSSINGS, EXTENSION OF BOX CULVERT(S), RELOCATION OF EXISTING QUARRY WEIGH SCALES AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(B) REHABILITATE RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN BERKS COUNTY (ROBESON TOWNSHIP, BIRDSBORO BOROUGH), INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(3) BLAIR COUNTY(I) SYNTHEX ORGANICS, LLC(A) INITIATE RAIL SERVICE IN BLAIR COUNTY, CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST AND TURNOUTS20250HB1331PN2389 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(4) CAMBRIA COUNTY(I) LEHIGH VALLEY RAIL MANAGEMENT(A) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN CAMBRIA COUNTY, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT, CROSSINGS, BRIDGES, YARDS AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 17,500,000(5) FRANKLIN COUNTY(I) PENNSYLVANIA AND SOUTHERN RAILWAY(A) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN FRANKLIN COUNTY, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, YARD TRACKS, CROSSINGS, BRIDGES, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(6) LEBANON COUNTY(I) PEACHEY RAIL WORKS, LLC(A) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN LEBANON COUNTY, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,500,000(7) LEHIGH COUNTY(I) LEHIGH VALLEY RAIL MANAGEMENT(A) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN LEHIGH COUNTY, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, DRAINAGE, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT, BRIDGES, YARDS AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR PROJECT COMPLETIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(8) NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTY(I) BOYD STATION(A) CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE IN NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTY TO FACILITATE AN EXPANSION OF THE RAILROAD TERMINAL, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, SITE PREPARATION, GRADING, RAIL, TIES, BALLAST, TURNOUTS, BUMPERS, DERAILS, BRIDGE, RAIL SCALE, LOADING/UNLOADING EQUIPMENT, CANOPY AND PRODUCT STORAGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 9,100,000(9) YORK COUNTY(I) YORK COUNTY ECONOMIC ALLIANCE(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE STEAM INTO HISTORY RAIL LINE EXTENSION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(10) MULTIPLE COUNTIES(I) ALLEGHENY VALLEY RAILROAD(A) CONSTRUCT NEW SIDETRACKS AND YARD TRACKS TO INCREASE CAPACITY TO SUPPORT CUSTOMER AND INTERMODAL DEVELOPMENT IN ALLEGHENY AND WASHINGTON COUNTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(B) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE AND EQUIPMENT TO SUPPORT NEW CUSTOMER DEVELOPMENT AND EXISTING CUSTOMER EXPANSIONS IN ALLEGHENY AND WASHINGTON COUNTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(II) NORTH SHORE RAILROAD(A) REHABILITATE RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING RAIL REPLACEMENT, TIES, BALLAST, SWITCHES, SIGNALS, CROSSINGS, BRIDGES AND ALL MATERIALS NECESSARY FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING TRACK IN AREAS OPERATED BY NORTH SHORE RAILROAD COMPANYPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(III) R.J. CORMAN RAILROAD GROUP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REHABILITATION OF THE RAIL LINE LOCATED IN CAMBRIA, CENTRE, CLEARFIELD, CLINTON AND INDIANA COUNTIES, INCLUDING RAILBED, TIES, RAIL AND OTHER MATERIALS TO SUPPORT BUSINESS GROWTH AND IMPROVE SAFETYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(IV) SOUTHWEST PENNSYLVANIA RAILROAD(A) REHABILITATE EXISTING RAILROAD INFRASTRUCTURE TO IMPROVE OPERATIONAL CAPACITY AND EFFICIENCY, INCLUDING PLANNING AND ENGINEERING, DRAINAGE, RAIL REPLACEMENT, TIES, RELATED TRACK MATERIALS, BRIDGES AND GRADE CROSSINGS IN WESTMORELAND AND FAYETTE COUNTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,400,000(B) CONSTRUCT NEW SIDETRACKS AND YARD TRACKS TO INCREASE CAPACITY TO SUPPORT CUSTOMER AND INTERMODAL DEVELOPMENT IN WESTMORELAND AND FAYETTE COUNTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,600,000(C) REHABILITATE AND CONSTRUCT RAIL INFRASTRUCTURE AND EQUIPMENT TO SUPPORT NEW CUSTOMER DEVELOPMENT AND EXISTING CUSTOMER EXPANSIONS IN WESTMORELAND AND FAYETTE COUNTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION(V) WEST CHESTER PASSENGER RAIL SERVICE RESTORATION20250HB1331PN2389 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) CONSTRUCTION AND REHABILITATION OF TRACK, SIGNAL, STATION, PEDESTRIAN/ANCILLARY FACILITIES AND SAFETY INFRASTRUCTURE FOR OPERATION OF WEST CHESTER RAILROAD TOURIST TRAINS, RESTORATION OF COMMON CARRIER PASSENGER RAIL SERVICE TO WEST CHESTER, WEST CHESTER UNIVERSITY, CHEYNEY UNIVERSITY AND WAWA AND RESTORATION OF FREIGHT RAIL SERVICEPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(c) Air transportation.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for air transportation service to which an interest is to be acquired by the Department of Transportation, it successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Northumberland County(i) Boyd Station(A) Construct rail infrastructure in Northumberland County to facilitate an expansion of the railroad terminal, including engineering, site preparation, grading, rail, ties, ballast, turnouts, bumpers, derails, bridge, rail scale, loading/unloading equipment, canopy and product storage20250HB1331PN2389 - 199 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 9,100,000(2) York County(i) York County Economic Alliance(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials, machinery and equipment and other related costs for the Steam Into History rail line extension projectProject Allocation 7,500,000(3) Multiple Counties(i) North Shore Railroad(A) Rehabilitate rail infrastructure, including rail replacement, ties, ballast, switches, signals, crossings, bridges and all materials necessary for the improvement of existing track in areas operated by North Shore Railroad CompanyProject Allocation 7,000,000(ii) Southwest Pennsylvania Railroad(A) Rehabilitate existing railroad infrastructure to improve operational capacity and efficiency, including planning and engineering, drainage, rail replacement, ties, related track materials, bridges and grade crossings in Westmoreland and Fayette CountiesProject Allocation 8,400,000(B) Construct new sidetracks and yard 20250HB1331PN2389 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tracks to increase capacity to support customer and intermodal development in Westmoreland and Fayette CountiesProject Allocation 5,600,000(iii) R.J. Corman Railroad Group(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for rehabilitation of the rail line located in Cambria, Centre, Clearfield, Clinton and Indiana Counties, including railbed, ties, rail and other materials to support business growth and improve safetyProject Allocation 20,000,000(iv) West Chester Passenger Rail Service Restoration(A) Construction and rehabilitation of track, signal, station, pedestrian/ancillary facilities and safety infrastructure for operation of West Chester Railroad tourist trains, restoration of common carrier passenger rail service to West Chester, West Chester University, Cheyney University and Wawa and restoration of freight rail serviceProject Allocation 25,000,000(1) ADAMS COUNTY(I) SUSQUEHANNA AREA REGIONAL AIRPORT AUTHORITY20250HB1331PN2389 - 201 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVES AT GETTYSBURG REGIONAL AIRPORTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(B) INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE WORK AND OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REHABILITATION OF EXISTING AVIATION FACILITIES AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW AVIATION FACILITIES AT GETTYSBURG REGIONAL AIRPORTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(2) BEAVER COUNTY(I) BEAVER COUNTY AIRPORT AUTHORITY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HANGARS AND FACILITY IMPROVEMENTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(II) CHIPPEWA TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HANGARS AND FACILITIES, CLASSROOMS AND A CONTROL TOWER AT THE BEAVER COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGE SCHOOL OF AVIATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,750,000(3) TIOGA COUNTY(I) GRAND CANYON AIRPORT AUTHORITY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 202 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR TERMINAL AREA AND AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS TO INFRASTRUCTURE AND DEVELOPMENT FOR NEW OPPORTUNITIES TO ACCOMMODATE THE GROWING INTEREST IN AVIATION AT HIGH SCHOOLSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(4) YORK COUNTY(I) SUSQUEHANNA AREA REGIONAL AIRPORT AUTHORITY(A) INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE WORK AND OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REHABILITATION OF EXISTING AVIATION FACILITIES AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW AVIATION FACILITIES AT THE CAPITAL CITY AIRPORT IN FAIRVIEW TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000Section 6. Itemization of redevelopment assistance projects.Additional capital projects in the category of redevelopment assistance projects for capital grants by the Department of Community and Economic Development, its successors or assigns, authorized under the provisions of the act of May 20, 1949 (P.L.1633, No.493), known as the Housing and Redevelopment Assistance Law, and redevelopment assistance capital projects and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation20250HB1331PN2389 - 203 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Adams County(i) County projects(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with the development of a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS AT THE LUTHERAN THEOLOGICAL SEMINARY AT GETTYSBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Adams County Industrial Development Authority(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with developing, expanding and/or improving Adams County Technical Institute facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to improve or expand TrueNorth 20250HB1331PN2389 - 204 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Wellness Services facilities in Adams CountyProject Allocation 3,000,000(C) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to improve or expand TrueNorth Wellness Services facilities in Adams CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to redevelop a former foundry site in Cumberland TownshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with developing, expanding and/or improving Adams County Children's Advocacy Center facilitiesProject Allocation 3,500,000(F) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, and/or other associated costs for the development of a Pennsylvania 20250HB1331PN2389 - 205 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Agricultural Discovery CenterProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) Susquehanna Regional Airport Authority(A) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for economic development initiatives at Gettysburg Regional AirportProject Allocation 2,500,000(iv) Carroll Valley Borough(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(v) Cumberland Township(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for the construction of a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(2) Allegheny County(i) County projects(A) Abatement, acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and rehabilitation for economic 20250HB1331PN2389 - 206 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development projects located in Allegheny CountyProject Allocation 500,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for improvements within the North Allegheny School DistrictProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN ALLEGHENY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN ALLEGHENY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 207 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MIXED-USE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT INVOLVING THE REVITALIZATION OF THE DIVINE PROVIDENCE HOSPITAL SITEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A RIVERFRONT MIXED-USE DEVELOPMENT IN SHARPSBURG BOROUGH AND O'HARA TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEVELOPMENT OF A SITE ALONG THE ALLEGHENY RIVER IN SHARPSBURG BOROUGH AND O'HARA TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Allegheny County Department of Economic Development(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for St. Clair HealthProject Allocation 18,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 208 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW FACILITY TO HOLD OFFICES AND OPERATIONS OF 412 FOOD RESCUE IN MILLVALEPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(iii) McCandless Township Sanitary Authority(A) Infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for an economic development project in McCandless TownshipProject Allocation 2,500,000(iv) Redevelopment Authority of Allegheny County(A) Infrastructure, renovation and other related costs to upgrade infrastructure equipment in the Pittsburgh Supercomputing Center data centerProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE WESTERN PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF IN THE BOROUGH OF EDGEWOODPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, POSSIBLE ABATEMENT OF 20250HB1331PN2389 - 209 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT RELATING TO THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE FORMER WESTINGHOUSE ELECTRIC FACILITY LOCATED IN TURTLE CREEK AND EAST PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR EXPANSION, IMPROVEMENT AND RESTORATION OF URBAN PARKS AND FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN OAKMONT BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) ABATEMENT, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND REDEVELOPMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN THE MONONGAHELA VALLEYPROJECT ALLOCATION 200,000,000(v) Urban Redevelopment Authority of Pittsburgh(A) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for the Nine Mile Run Phase III, Swisshelm Park Solar and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 210 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expansion of Frick Park projectsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A LICENSED ADULT RESPITE AND DAY SERVICES PROVIDER IN THE CITY OF PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE WESTERN PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL FOR BLIND CHILDRENPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR GRANDVIEW AVENUE CORRIDOR IMPROVEMENTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT RELATING TO THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE FAIRYWOOD INDUSTRIAL PARK LOCATED IN THE CITY OF PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 211 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT RELATING TO THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE FORMER MILL 18 AND 19 SITES LOCATED IN THE HAZELWOOD COMMUNITY OF THE CITY OF PITTSBURGH PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(G) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS IN ALLEGHENY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(H) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS ON 62ND STREETPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(I) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CULTURAL, CIVIC OR HISTORIC PROJECTS20250HB1331PN2389 - 212 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(J) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO REVITALIZATION PROJECTS THROUGHOUT COMMERCIAL CORRIDORS IN PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(K) PREDEVELOPMENT COSTS, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SCI SITEPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(L) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT OF BLIGHTED PROPERTIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 14,000,000(vi) City of Pittsburgh(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure development, redevelopment, abatement, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for Point Park University's (PPU) Downtown Pittsburgh Renaissance III project, located in the downtown area of the City of PittsburghProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Construction, redevelopment and related costs for the Manchester 20250HB1331PN2389 - 213 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Academic Charter School's expanded campusProject Allocation 6,000,000(C) Construction and related costs for a health sciences building at Duquesne UniversityProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Acquisition, infrastructure and other related costs for a mixed-use development with an emphasis on technology and research and development located in the Hazelwood and Oakland neighborhoodsProject Allocation 4,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Pittsburgh Downtown Commercial Office Conversion Program projectProject Allocation 50,000,000(F) Construction, infrastructure, environmental remediation, acquisition and other related costs for the former St. Clair Village siteProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Facilities construction, infrastructure improvements, renovations and other costs for Carnegie Science CenterProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 214 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (H) Facilities construction, infrastructure improvements, renovations and other costs for The Andy Warhol MuseumProject Allocation 10,000,000(I) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for improvements at the Carnegie Museum of Natural HistoryProject Allocation 10,000,000(J) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for the Carnegie Museums Project Allocation 10,000,000(K) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for improvements to the Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh library system and branchesProject Allocation 7,500,000(L) Acquisition, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for building upgrades and outdoor improvements for Brookline Teen OutreachProject Allocation 1,000,000(M) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for improvements to the Carnegie Museum of Art20250HB1331PN2389 - 215 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(N) Construction and other related costs for the renovation of a historic landmark in the strip districtProject Allocation 500,000(O) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for an economic development project for Point Park UniversityProject Allocation 2,500,000(P) Facilities construction, infrastructure improvements, renovations and other costs for Carnegie Museum of ArtProject Allocation 20,000,000(Q) Acquisition, remediation, redevelopment, construction and other related costs for a facility or campus to support the operations and expansion of the Pittsburgh Robotics Network and its member organizationsProject Allocation 20,000,000(R) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE PITTSBURGH SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA HEINZ HALL RENOVATION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(S) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 216 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR PROJECTS AT THE FRICK ART AND HISTORICAL CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(T) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR EXPANSION, IMPROVEMENT AND RESTORATION OF URBAN PARKS AND FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(U) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF ATHLETIC FACILITIES, INCLUDING TURF FIELDS AND TRACKS IN SQUIRREL HILLPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(V) SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, REHABILITATION, EXPANSION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CHILDREN'S INSTITUTE'S SQUIRREL HILL FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(W) NEW CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS THAT CREATE INCLUSIVE AND SUSTAINABLE LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS ON OR NEAR THE CHILDREN'S MUSEUM OF PITTSBURGH'S NORTHSIDE CAMPUS IN THE CITY OF PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 217 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (X) PROCUREMENT, CONSTRUCTION AND INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES NEEDED TO PREPARE THE CARLOW UNIVERSITY CAMPUS IN THE CITY OF PITTSBURGH FOR PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF A CENTRAL NATURAL GAS-POWERED EMERGENCY GENERATORPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(Y) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO PREPARE A STRATEGIC PARCEL OF LAND ON THE CARLOW UNIVERSITY CAMPUS IN THE OAKLAND NEIGHBORHOOD OF PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(Z) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE HILL TOP HOMES PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(AA) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS AT MATTRESS FACTORY FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(BB) SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, REHABILITATION, EXPANSION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CHILDREN'S INSTITUTE'S SQUIRREL HILL FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 218 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (CC) SITE PREPARATION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION, REHABILITATION, EXPANSION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE KELLY STRAYHORN THEATER AND ALLOY STUDIOSPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(DD) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO ACQUIRE PROPERTY IN THE CITY OF PITTSBURGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(EE) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS AT THE CLEMENTE MUSEUMPROJECT ALLOCATION 600,000(FF) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS AT DUQUESNE UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(vii) Bellevue Borough(A) Acquisition, design, construction, infrastructure redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation, facility improvements, machinery and equipment and other costs related to the Mid-Atlantic Mother's Milk Bank expansion projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(viii) Bethel Park Borough20250HB1331PN2389 - 219 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and/or related costs for a redevelopment projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(VIII.1) CRAFTON BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VIII.2) FOX CHAPEL BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN INTERNATIONAL CONSERVATION CENTER FOR THE NATIONAL AVIARY PITTSBURGH INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VIII.3) GREEN TREE BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 220 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VIII.4) HEIDELBERG BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VIII.5) INGRAM BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VIII.6) MARSHALL TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 221 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (VIII.7) MCKEES ROCKS BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE EXPANSION OF MANCINI'S BAKERYPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(ix) Mount Oliver Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and related costs for the Transverse Park Phase 1 improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for a partnership between LEVEL and the municipality to acquire five vacant lotsProject Allocation 7,000,000(IX.1) PENN HILLS TOWNSHIP(A) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REDEVELOPMENT, EQUIPMENT PURCHASES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR TURNER DAIRY FARMPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(B) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 222 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR THE PENN HILLS LIBRARYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(IX.2) PLUM BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN PLUM BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(IX.3) ROSSLYN FARMS BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(IX.4) SEWICKLEY BOROUGH(A) INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR VERLAND'S MAIN CAMPUS IN SEWICKLEY BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(IX.5) SCOTT TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 223 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(IX.6) THORNBURG BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(IX.7) WEST MIFFLIN BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATIONS FOR THE TOM JOHNSON BOYS ACADEMYPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(IX.8) WEST VIEW BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW BOROUGH BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(x) Wilkinsburg Borough(A) Construction, renovation and other related costs for improvements to a municipal buildingProject Allocation 5,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 224 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Acquisition, construction, renovation, infrastructure and other costs related to public improvements and economic development projects in the Borough of WilkinsburgProject Allocation 25,000,000(xi) Elizabeth Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Elizabeth Township Municipal Complex, community center and emergency services centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(xii) Hampton Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the construction of public safety facilities within the townshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, renovation and/or other related costs for the construction of new and enhancements to existing recreational and public safety facilitiesProject Allocation 7,000,000(C) (B) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation 20250HB1331PN2389 - 225 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(XII.1) MARSHALL TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE RELOCATION AND EXPANSION OF TEAMSTERS 249 HEADQUARTERSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(xiii) McCandless Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for renovations to La Roche University, including a health and wellness center and cybercrime lab Project Allocation 2,512,000(xiv) Pine Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for police barracksProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment and/or other costs related to the expansion of a community center and parkProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and/or 20250HB1331PN2389 - 226 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other costs related to building a new public safety buildingProject Allocation 10,000,000(xv) Ohio Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs to construct a satellite EMS facility, a fire and rescue training facility and acquire and develop additional propertiesProject Allocation 10,850,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS WITHIN THE AVONWORTH SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,000,000(xvi) Richland Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation and other costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(xvii) West Deer Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation and other costs for an economic development project20250HB1331PN2389 - 227 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,500,000(3) Armstrong County(i) Armstrong County Industrial Development Council(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, site improvements, possible abatement of hazardous materials, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for an economic development project located in the Armstrong Innovation Park in South Buffalo TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, site improvements, possible abatement of hazardous materials, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for an economic development project relating to the redevelopment of the former Armstrong County Power Plant in Washington TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(4) Beaver County(i) County projects(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for economic 20250HB1331PN2389 - 228 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development, commercial, public improvement, sewage, blight removal, road, bridge, rail, waterway and aviation projects in Beaver CountyProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Acquisition, infrastructure, construction, redevelopment and other related costs for riverfront development along the Ohio RiverProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Neighborhood North Museum of PlayProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for a project associated with hospitality, agriculture or culinaryProject Allocation 2,500,000(E) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Beaver County Airport Authority20250HB1331PN2389 - 229 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for hangars and facility improvements in Chippewa TownshipProject Allocation 2,500,000(iii) Redevelopment Authority of Beaver County(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the reconstruction of 3rd Street in Midland BoroughProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for development of the Bet-Tech Industrial Park in Hopewell TownshipProject Allocation 3,500,000(iv) City of Aliquippa(A) Renovation, rehabilitation, redevelopment, acquisition, abatement of hazardous materials, infrastructure, construction and related costs for the development of an Anchor Building ProjectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, DESIGN AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A HISTORIC UNION HALL IN ALIQUIPPA20250HB1331PN2389 - 230 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(v) City of Beaver Falls(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for student, academic and/or athletic facilities at Geneva CollegeProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and/or related costs to modernize and provide ADA accessibility to Old Main on the campus of Geneva CollegeProject Allocation 4,000,000(C) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs to renovate, expand and/or build new facilities for the Neighborhood North Museum of PlayProject Allocation 2,000,000(D) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(E) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and related costs for the transformation of the 20250HB1331PN2389 - 231 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Carnegie Free Library of Beaver Falls into a restored cultural arts centerProject Allocation 3,000,000(vi) Ambridge Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the development of an anchor building projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, abatement, infrastructure and construction of a road to connect 19th Street (SR 0989) to Merchant Street and SR 0065Project Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF AMBRIDGE BOROUGH COMMUNITY FOOD HUB FACILITY 20250HB1331PN2389 - 232 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES WITHIN BEAVER COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(VI.1) BADEN BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION AND RENOVATION OF AN ANCHOR BUILDING PROJECT IN THE BOROUGH OF BADENPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(vii) Big Beaver Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for economic development at the Pennsylvania Turnpike intersectionsProject Allocation 7,000,000(B) Acquisition, site development, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for improvement and expansion projects at Pittsburgh International Race ComplexProject Allocation 3,750,000(C) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development project20250HB1331PN2389 - 233 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,500,000(viii) Bridgewater Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(VIII.1) CONWAY BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT, DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION AND RENOVATION OF AN ANCHOR BUILDING PROJECT IN THE BOROUGH OF CONWAYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(ix) Economy Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(x) Freedom Borough(A) Acquisition, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement, redevelopment, construction and renovation of an anchor building projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Midland Borough20250HB1331PN2389 - 234 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for Lincoln Park Performing Arts Charter School expansion projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(xii) Monaca Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs of an anchor building projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for development of the George Washington PlazaProject Allocation 2,500,000(xiii) New Brighton Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(xiv) Rochester Borough(A) Acquisition, rehabilitation, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 235 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, abatement, redevelopment, construction and renovation of an anchor building projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement, redevelopment, construction and renovation of the Rochester Borough Municipal Building, including the public theater, museum and police facilityProject Allocation 5,000,000(xv) Brighton Township(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation and/or related costs for upgraded healthcare facilities at Heritage Valley Health System Beaver HospitalProject Allocation 2,500,000(xvi) Center Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for development of the retail corridor on Brodhead RoadProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation 20250HB1331PN2389 - 236 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other related costs for a sports-related facilityProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Acquisition, site development, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for youth sports and recreation facilities at the M:7 Sports Pittsburgh sports complexProject Allocation 4,500,000(D) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and other related costs for improvements at Beaver County Transit Authority's Center Township Terminal facilityProject Allocation 1,500,000(xvii) Chippewa Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for hangars, facilities, classrooms and a control tower at the Beaver County Community College School of AviationProject Allocation 3,750,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 237 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xviii) Darlington Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for improvements to Cannelton Road Industrial ParkProject Allocation 2,500,000(xix) Franklin Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(xx) Harmony Township(A) Acquisition, construction, equipment, infrastructure, rehabilitation, environmental improvements and other related costs for parks, recreational space and open space in the townshipProject Allocation 3,000,000(xxi) Hopewell Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 238 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for development of the retail corridor on Brodhead RoadProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the development of new multipurpose government, community and emergency responders building or buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the development of the Hopewell Shopping CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Renovation, rehabilitation, redevelopment, acquisition, abatement of hazardous materials, infrastructure, construction and other related costs for development of an indoor/outdoor sports and recreation complexProject Allocation 3,000,000(5) Bedford County20250HB1331PN2389 - 239 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Bedford County Development Association(A) Acquisition, construction, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment, redevelopment and other related costs for expansion and/or renovation of the Bedford County Technical Center in Snake Spring TownshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Bedford Borough(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure improvements, redevelopment, abatement of natural hazardous materials, renovation and rehabilitation and other related costs for improvements at The GreenProject Allocation 1,300,000(B) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure improvements, redevelopment, abatement of natural hazardous materials, renovation and rehabilitation and other related costs for improvements to public safety and emergency servicesProject Allocation 1,000,000(C) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment, abatement of natural hazardous materials, renovation and rehabilitation and other related costs 20250HB1331PN2389 - 240 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for improvements at Fort Bedford ParkProject Allocation 3,600,000(6) Berks County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR KUTZTOWN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR MUHLENBERG SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT FOR A PROJECT FOR READING MUHLENBERG CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 241 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION AND/OR RENOVATION ACTIVITIES RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT AND/OR REDEVELOPMENT OF THE SOUTHERN BERKS INDUSTRIAL PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (I.1) City of Reading(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, renovation and rehabilitation of sites and other related costs for Opportunity House facilitiesProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction and other related costs for the Rose Corporation expansionProject Allocation 6,000,000(C) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF BUILDINGS AND 20250HB1331PN2389 - 242 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FACILITIES AT THE ROSE CORPORATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS AT THE BERKS HISTORY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS AT THE READING MUHLENBERG CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH HOSPITAL IN THE CITY OF READINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(ii) Laureldale Borough(A) Construction and other related costs for a new fire station in the Borough of LaureldaleProject Allocation 1,000,000(II.1) MUHLENBERG TOWNSHIP20250HB1331PN2389 - 243 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS TO THE READING MUHLENBERG CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(iii) New Morgan Borough(A) Acquisition, site preparation, remediation, infrastructure, construction and/or renovation activities related to the development and/or redevelopment of the Southern Berks Industrial ParkProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) Wyomissing Borough(A) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, environmental remediation, infrastructure, construction, equipment and other related costs for an economic development or community development project undertaken by or in conjunction with the Borough of WyomissingProject Allocation 20,000,000(v) Spring Township(A) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, environmental remediation, infrastructure, construction, equipment and other 20250HB1331PN2389 - 244 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs for the Broadcasting Village mixed-use development project at the intersection of Route 222 and Broadcasting Road in Spring TownshipProject Allocation 20,000,000(7) Blair County (Reserved)(8) Bradford County (Reserved)(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN BRADFORD COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN BRADFORD COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(9) Bucks County(i) County projects(A) Land acquisition, construction, demolition, site preparation, infrastructure improvements and other related costs for Trinity Health20250HB1331PN2389 - 245 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 7,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A BIOTECH FACILITY IN PIPERSVILLEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT, REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE OPTIMIZATION OF VARIOUS BUCKS COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGE FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS AND OTHER COSTS FOR THE MERCER MUSEUM AND FONTHILL CASTLE COMPLEXPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Bucks County Redevelopment Authority(A) Construction, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Third District Volunteer Fire Company State Renovation ProjectProject Allocation 750,000(II.1) DOYLESTOWN HOSPITAL AUTHORITY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 246 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DOYLESTOWN HOSPITALPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(iii) Bensalem Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of a capital improvement or economic development project constructed by Bensalem TownshipProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) Bristol Township(A) Redevelopment, construction and other related costs to expand the Family Service Association of Bucks County's homeless shelterProject Allocation 7,500,000(V) BUCKINGHAM TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN BUCKINGHAM TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, RENOVATIONS, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE HISTORIC GENERAL GREENE INNPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VI) NEW BRITAIN TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE 20250HB1331PN2389 - 247 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS TO SUPPORT AN EXPANSION OF A CONSTRUCTION WASTE AND DEMOLITION RECYCLING FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,000,000(VII) SOLEBURY TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN SOLEBURY TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, SITE DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, EQUIPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR OPEN SPACE, TRAIL, TOURISM AND OUTDOOR RECREATION PROJECTS IN THE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(v) (VIII) West Rockhill Township(A) Acquisition, infrastructure and other costs related to the replacement of a PET scanner at Grand View Health located at the Sellersville Outpatient CenterProject Allocation 1,000,000(10) Butler County(I) REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY OF THE COUNTY OF BUTLER20250HB1331PN2389 - 248 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENT OF FACILITIES TO SUPPORT GROWTH IN PRODUCTION VOLUMES AND JOBS FOR IRON MOUNTAINPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,500,000(i) (II) East Butler Borough(A) Acquisition, construction and/or other costs related to acquisition of facilities, infrastructure improvements, including roof replacement, creation of a ballistics testing laboratory and various facility upgrades designed to enhance energy efficiency, reduce carbon emissions and lessen dependence on the electrical grid, and expansion and enhancement of the parking lotProject Allocation 2,000,000(11) Cambria County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, abatement of hazardous materials, infrastructure, construction, redevelopment, site development and other related costs of a project for the National Electrical Contractors Association and its membership20250HB1331PN2389 - 249 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 7,000,000(II) CITY OF JOHNSTOWN(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF CAMBRIA COUNTY WAR MEMORIAL FACILITY PROJECT FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES WITHIN CAMBRIA COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE 20250HB1331PN2389 - 250 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF WOMEN'S HELP CENTER COMMUNITY HELP CENTER FACILITY FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES WITHIN CAMBRIA COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(III) LORETTO BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF SAINT FRANCIS UNIVERSITY FACILITIES FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(IV) CRESSON TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE MOUNT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 251 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALOYSIUS COLLEGE CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(V) JACKSON TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE IBEW LOCAL 126 CALVIN R PETERSON TRAINING SCHOOL PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(VI) RICHLAND TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF SAINT FRANCIS UNIVERSITY FACILITIES FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 252 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF JOHNSTOWN-CAMBRIA COUNTY AIRPORT AUTHORITY FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,275,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF AERIUM- MARTIN-BAKER BUILDING PROJECT FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES20250HB1331PN2389 - 253 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(D) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF AERIUM- REGIONAL JET AND INNOVATION CENTER FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,500,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 254 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF RICHLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT ELEMENTARY FACILITY PROJECT FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VII) STONYCREEK TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE WORK AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF A MUNICIPAL COMPLEXPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(ii) (VIII) Susquehanna Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the design and construction of a new fire station/public safety building for the Hope Fire Company in Northern Cambria BoroughProject Allocation 1,500,000(12) Cameron County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, construction and other related costs for a health care facility that would provide maternal care, including childbirth servicesProject Allocation 10,000,000(13) Carbon County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS20250HB1331PN2389 - 255 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR PANTHER VALLEY SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(i) (II) Parryville Borough(A) Construction and other related costs for the consolidation of a municipal hall, fire department and emergency shelter into one centralized locationProject Allocation 1,250,000(14) Centre County(i) Bellefonte Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and/or other costs associated with the Bellefonte Waterfront ProjectProject Allocation 2,000,000(ii) State College Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, improvements, renovations, upgrades, environmental remediation, repairs and other related costs for the redevelopment of a condominiumProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) College Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 256 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construction, redevelopment and other related costs for renovation of two historic buildings at the ClearWater ConservancyProject Allocation 3,000,000(15) Chester County(i) County projects(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs for Kennett Consolidated School District projectsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate a farmhouse and neighboring facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, site improvements, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs with upgrades for Farmhouse Enterprises, LLC, and the surrounding space, facilities and landProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other 20250HB1331PN2389 - 257 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs for the redevelopment and improvement of the Paoli train stationProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to support development within Anson B. Nixon Park Project Allocation 5,000,000(F) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and other associated costs related to an economic or community development project advanced by Square Roots CollectiveProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT, EXPANSION, REDEVELOPMENT AND REVITALIZATION OF A NEMOURS CHILDREN'S HEALTH SYSTEM PEDIATRIC FACILITY LOCATED IN CHESTER COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(H) SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL 20250HB1331PN2389 - 258 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IMPROVEMENTS TO THE YMCA OF GREATER BRANDYWINE FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(I) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II) CHESTER COUNTY INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY(A) LAND ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, DEMOLITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, RENOVATION, ADDITION, UTILITY EXPANSION, CONSTRUCTION, PURCHASE OF MEDICAL EQUIPMENT AND FIXTURES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES OF MAIN LINE HOSPITALS, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(III) CITY OF COATESVILLE(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, PUBLIC WORKS OR CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN BY THE CITY OF 20250HB1331PN2389 - 259 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COATESVILLEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) (IV) Downingtown Borough(A) Construction ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade, relocate and renovate the borough hall, police station and other municipal buildingsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR STREETSCAPE AND REVITALIZATION OF PROPERTY IN DOWNINGTOWN BOROUGH FOR MIXED USE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING RETAIL, COMMERCIAL AND RESIDENTIAL USESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF A MUNICIPAL PARKING GARAGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(iii) (V) Kennett Square Borough(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated 20250HB1331PN2389 - 260 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs related to an economic and/or community development project in Kennett SquareProject Allocation 10,000,000(VI) OXFORD BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE OR OTHER CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN IN THE BOROUGH OF OXFORDPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(VII) PARKESBURG BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, PUBLIC WORKS OR CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN BY THE BOROUGH OF PARKESBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(iv) (VIII) Phoenixville Borough(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, development, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation renovation and other related expenses to support an economic development projectProject Allocation 40,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 261 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (IX) CALN TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR SPACKMAN-DAVIS FARMHOUSE PROPERTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CALN TOWNSHIP PUBLIC WORKS BUILDING AND GARAGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,500,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SPACKMAN-DAVIS AND KINGS HIGHWAY PARK AND RECREATIONAL CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE THORNDALE FIRE STATION EXPANSION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION 20250HB1331PN2389 - 262 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE BEAVER CREEK TRAILPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(F) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CALN TOWNSHIP MUNICIPAL COMPLEXPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE OLD CALN MEETINGHOUSE BUILDING AND GROUNDSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(H) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CALN TOWNSHIP COMMUNITY CENTER PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(I) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, LAND ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE BARLEY SHEAF PARK AND PLAYGROUND PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(J) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 263 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR THE INGLESIDE GOLF CLUBHOUSEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(K) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR TOWNSHIP PARK IMPROVEMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,000,000(v) (X) Easttown Township(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 15,000,000(vi) (XI) East Marlborough Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and other costs associated costs to improve or expand Longwood Gardens facilities in Chester CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(XI.1) EAST VINCENT TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN EAST VINCENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 264 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(vii) (XII) Kennett Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to reconstruct Greenwood Elementary SchoolProject Allocation 14,000,000(XIII) LONDONDERRY TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE OR OTHER CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN IN LONDONDERRY TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(viii) (XIV) New Garden Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to reconstruct New Garden Elementary SchoolProject Allocation 14,000,000(XV) NEW LONDON TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC 20250HB1331PN2389 - 265 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE OR OTHER CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN IN NEW LONDON TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(XV.1) NORTH COVENTRY TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW TOWNSHIP ADMINISTRATION AND POLICE DEPARTMENT BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,500,000(ix) (XVI) Richland Township(A) Infrastructure updates and improvements, environmental remediation, construction and other related costs for the Lehigh Valley Hospital - Cedar Crest and expansion of Lehigh Valley Health NetworkProject Allocation 10,000,000(x) (XVII) Schuylkill Township(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) (XVIII) Tredyffrin Township(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for an economic development project20250HB1331PN2389 - 266 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 15,000,000(XIX) UPPER UWCHLAN TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, REPAIR AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO UPGRADE, RELOCATE AND RENOVATE THE TOWNSHIP ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICESPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(XX) UWCHLAN TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, REPAIR AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO UPGRADE AND RENOVATE THE TOWNSHIP ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES, POLICE STATION, PUBLIC WORKS FACILITIES AND OTHER MUNICIPAL BUILDINGSPROJECT ALLOCATION 13,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, REPAIR AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF COMMUNITY AND RECREATION CENTER PROJECTS IN UWCHLAN TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF COMMERCIAL PROPERTIES INTO WORKFORCE HOUSING20250HB1331PN2389 - 267 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION AND RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UWCHLAN AMBULANCE STATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(xii) (XXI) Willistown Township(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 15,000,000(16) Clarion County (Reserved)(17) Clearfield County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, abatement of hazardous materials, renovation and/or other costs for redevelopment projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, abatement of hazardous materials, infrastructure, construction, redevelopment, site development and other related costs of a project for the National Electrical Contractors Association and its membershipProject Allocation 7,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 268 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Clearfield County Economic Development Corporation(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to the removal of two dams, creation of two whitewater parks and construction of a whitewater villageProject Allocation 8,000,000(iii) North Central Pennsylvania Regional Planning and Development Commission(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to the construction of a multistory building with apartments for older residents with parking, garages and storage units in the City of DuBoisProject Allocation 5,150,000(iv) City of DuBois(A) Construction, infrastructure and/or other costs related to renovation of the Salvation Army's DuBois locationProject Allocation 600,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 269 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Morris Township(A) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including machinery and equipment, for a project at West Branch School DistrictProject Allocation 7,000,000(vi) Sandy Township(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with facilities at DuBois - Treasure Lake KOAProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with an economic and/or facilities development project at Treasure LakeProject Allocation 5,000,000(18) Clinton County(i) Mill Hall Borough(A) Acquisition, site preparation, infrastructure, remediation, renovation, construction and/or other related costs associated with the development and/or expansion of a 20250HB1331PN2389 - 270 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wheat and rye processing facilityProject Allocation 4,000,000(19) Columbia County(i) County projects(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for improvements to and/or expansions of Bloomsburg Area YMCA's facilityProject Allocation 8,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR THE ADVANCEMENT AND EXPANSION OF LOCAL MANUFACTURING NEEDS FOCUSED ON PLASTICS AND SIMILAR PRODUCT FABRICATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(20) Crawford County(i) Titusville Redevelopment Authority(A) Acquisition, demolition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the University of Pittsburgh at Titusville, including renovation and rehabilitation of existing facilities and construction of new facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(II) ECONOMIC PROGRESS ALLIANCE OF CRAWFORD 20250HB1331PN2389 - 271 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COUNTY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ALLEGHENY COLLEGE CAMPUS AND BRANCH CAMPUSESPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(21) Cumberland County(i) County projects(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and other associated costs for the development of the Carlisle Sports EmporiumProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, site preparation, remediation, infrastructure, construction and renovation activities related to the development or redevelopment of a large-scale industrial site or facility in Cumberland CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Acquisition, construction and infrastructure development for a neighborhood redevelopment projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Acquisition, site development, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 272 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, renovation, infrastructure, equipment and other related costs for facilities, fixed or mobile, in which to conduct Cumberland County government businessProject Allocation 15,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A FIRE STATION LOCATED IN MECHANICSBURG BOROUGH, CUMBERLAND COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A SCHOOL SAFETY INSTITUTEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) SITE PREPARATION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE CARLISLE SPORTS EMPORIUMPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, SITE DEVELOPMENT, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 273 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES, FIXED OR MOBILE, IN WHICH TO CONDUCT CUMBERLAND COUNTY GOVERNMENT BUSINESSPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(I) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR AN OZ FUND INC.-AFFILIATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, CULTURAL, HISTORICAL AND/OR REVITALIZATION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(J) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND COMMUNITY GROWTH INITIATIVESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(K) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE PENN STATE HOLY SPIRIT MEDICAL CENTER FACILITY AND CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(ii) Capital Region Economic Development Corporation(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for the Penn State 20250HB1331PN2389 - 274 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Health Holy Spirit Medical Center facility and campus in East Pennsboro TownshipProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) Cumberland Area Economic Development Corporation(A) Site preparation, remediation, acquisition, demolition, renovation, construction, infrastructure improvements and/or other associated costs for the redevelopment of brownfield sites in Cumberland CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) (A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and other associated costs for the development of the Carlisle Sports EmporiumProject Allocation 5,000,000(iv) Cumberland County Industrial Development Authority(A) Acquisition, demolition, site work, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction related to redevelopment projects located in business districts and downtown areasProject Allocation 1,792,500PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(B) Construction, acquisition, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 275 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation and other costs related to an economic development projectProject Allocation 30,000,000PROJECT ALLOCATION 60,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR A CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN BY MESSIAH UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND/OR OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF BROWNFIELD SITES IN CUMBERLAND COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(IV.1) CAMP HILL BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AT THE CAPITAL CITY MALLPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(v) Carlisle Borough(A) Site preparation, remediation, acquisition, demolition, renovation, construction, infrastructure improvements and/or other associated 20250HB1331PN2389 - 276 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs for the redevelopment of the former Frog Switch & Manufacturing site in Carlisle BoroughProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF AN UNDERUTILIZED FORMER INDUSTRIAL SITE ON CHERRY STREET IN THE BOROUGH OF CARLISLEPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(V.1) EAST PENNSBORO TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF COMMUNITY SPORTS AND RECREATIONAL FACILITIES AT EAST PENNSBORO AREA SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(vi) Hampden Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of a community or economic development project in Hampden Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 277 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Middlesex Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, equipment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for improvements to property and facilities at a family-oriented social and sports clubProject Allocation 5,000,000(viii) Monroe Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for a community revitalization and economic development projectProject Allocation 7,500,000(B) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MULTIPURPOSE SPORTS AND ENTERTAINMENT COMPLEXPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(ix) North Middleton Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of a community and/or economic development project in North Middleton TownshipProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 278 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A COMMUNITY OR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN NORTH MIDDLETON TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(x) Shippensburg Borough(A) Acquisition, site preparation, demolition, remediation, infrastructure, construction, renovations and/or other associated costs related to a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) Construction, site improvement, infrastructure, remediation, redevelopment, equipment and/or other related costs to improve or expand Schreiber Foods, Inc.'s, Shippensburg facilityProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) Silver Spring Township(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with developing a community center, work force development center and dental clinic 20250HB1331PN2389 - 279 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in Silver Spring TownshipProject Allocation 7,500,000(xii) South Middleton Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation, infrastructure and/or renovation activities related to the development of a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of a recreational and sports facility projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(xiii) Upper Allen Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, equipment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for improvements to property and facilitiesProject Allocation 7,500,000(22) Dauphin County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for economic development projects within the county20250HB1331PN2389 - 280 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 30,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for affordable housing within the countyProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for improvements to county-owned buildingsProject Allocation 40,000,000(D) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for the consolidation of county health and human services operationsProject Allocation 20,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for a memorial honoring fallen police officersProject Allocation 2,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 281 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR HARRISTOWN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION AND OR RELATED ENTITIES LOCATED IN HARRISBURG CITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR PROJECTS INVOLVING A NEW HEADQUARTERS AND TRAINING FACILITY FOR A MECHANICAL CONSTRUCTION, ENGINEERING, MAINTENANCE AND ENERGY SERVICE ORGANIZATION LOCATED IN SUSQUEHANNA TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR MIDDLETOWN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(I) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS FOR THE SWIMHERSHEY AQUATICS FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 282 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION SITE DEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MILLERSBURG AREA SCHOOL DISTRICT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(K) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND COMMUNITY GROWTH INITIATIVESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Capital Region Economic Development Corporation(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for the Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center facility and campus, to include Penn State College of MedicineProject Allocation 35,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to Spirit Production and Packaging building renovation and new building construction in Derry TownshipProject Allocation 7,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 283 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Capital Region Water(A) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, remediation and new construction for activities related to improving the aging infrastructure in the City of HarrisburgProject Allocation 50,000,000(iv) Dauphin County Redevelopment Authority(A) Construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Historic Tracy MansionProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HARRISBURG SCOTTISH RITE CATHEDRAL AND THEATREPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(v) City of Harrisburg(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate the Jewish Family Services of Greater Harrisburg facilityProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, abatement of hazardous materials, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 284 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation and rehabilitation of site and other related costs for the Jewish Federation of Greater Harrisburg facilities located in the city of HarrisburgProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Redevelopment, construction, infrastructure, rehabilitation and other related costs for the historic Tracy Mansion renovation project located at 1829 North Front StreetProject Allocation 4,500,000(D) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs associated with the Jewish Federation of Greater Harrisburg facilities, including the Alexander Grass Campus for Jewish Life Project Allocation 5,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for the relocation of a mass transit operation within the City of HarrisburgProject Allocation 25,000,000(F) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials, machinery and equipment and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 285 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other related costs for the dechannelization of Paxton Creek to allow for flood mitigation and additional redevelopmentProject Allocation 60,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, DEMOLITION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATIONS AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HARRISBURG AREA YMCA FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(H) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE INN OF THE DOVEPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(I) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE YWCA OF GREATER HARRISBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(J) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE BROAD STREET MARKETPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(K) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR 20250HB1331PN2389 - 286 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ADA IMPROVEMENTS AT THE MLK BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(L) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A STANDARD OLYMPIC-SIZED SWIMMING POOL IN THE CITY OF HARRISBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(M) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REDEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN DOWNTOWN HARRISBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 100,000,000(N) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS ALONG PAXTON CREEKPROJECT ALLOCATION 60,000,000(O) CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT OF THE 19TH STREET ARMORYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 287 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P) REDEVELOPMENT, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REHABILITATION OF HISTORICAL AND BLIGHTED STRUCTURESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(Q) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT AND IMPROVEMENTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(R) ABATEMENT, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN THE CITY OF HARRISBURGPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(vi) Dauphin Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure and/or other costs related to a community building projectProject Allocation 1,500,000(VI.1) HALIFAX BOROUGH(A) SITE PREPARATION, DEMOLITION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT OR EXPANSION OF A HARRISBURG AREA YMCA 20250HB1331PN2389 - 288 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHILDCARE AND EARLY EDUCATION CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(vii) Hummelstown Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to the restoration of the historic Hotel WarwickProject Allocation 1,750,000(viii) Penbrook Borough(A) Construction and redevelopment of a borough municipal buildingProject Allocation 4,200,000(ix) Steelton Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the Steelton Highspire School District Sports Complex multiphased projectProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR THE REVITALIZATION OF THE STEEL PLANT SITE IN STEELTON BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(x) Lower Paxton Township(A) Construction, infrastructure and/or other costs related to a project at Harrisburg Christian SchoolProject Allocation 1,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 289 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, DEMOLITION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATIONS AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE FRIENDSHIP YMCAPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(xi) Lower Swatara Township(A) Site preparation, acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other associated costs for improvements to or expansion of Wilsbach Distributor, Inc.'s, facility in support of a carbon neutrality initiativeProject Allocation 5,000,000(xii) Susquehanna Township(A) Construction, renovation, improvements, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, infrastructure, machinery and equipment, HVAC and other related costs for the Capital Blue Cross office in Susquehanna TownshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for Susquehanna Union 20250HB1331PN2389 - 290 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GreenProject Allocation 2,500,000(C) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A PUBLIC SAFETY BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(xiii) Swatara Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition and other related costs for facility and equipment upgrades at WITFProject Allocation 10,000,000(23) Delaware County(i) County projects(A) Land acquisition, construction, demolition, site preparation, infrastructure improvements and other related costs for Trinity HealthProject Allocation 75,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN DELAWARE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 291 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN DELAWARE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT AT CHESTER UPLAND SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION AT DELAWARE COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT, EXPANSION, REDEVELOPMENT AND REVITALIZATION OF A NEMOURS CHILDREN'S HEALTH SYSTEM PEDIATRIC FACILITY LOCATED IN DELAWARE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 292 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF WIDENER UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Delaware County Redevelopment Authority(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovations, rehabilitation and other related costs for healthcare facilities in the City of Chester and Upland BoroughProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovations, rehabilitation and other related costs for capital projects at Neumann UniversityProject Allocation 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 293 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) LAND ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, DEMOLITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, RENOVATION, ADDITION, UTILITY EXPANSION, CONSTRUCTION, PURCHASE OF MEDICAL EQUIPMENT AND FIXTURES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RIDDLE HOSPITAL AND FACILITIES OF MAIN LINE HOSPITALS, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HEALTHCARE FACILITIES IN SPRINGFIELD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, DEMOLITION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPLEMENTATION OF THE ELWYN CAMPUS MASTER PLAN IN MIDDLETOWN TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(F) ABATEMENT, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN THE CITY OF CHESTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION 20250HB1331PN2389 - 294 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AT THE WIDENER UNIVERSITY CAMPUS IN THE CITY OF CHESTER, DELAWARE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II.1) DELAWARE COUNTY INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AT VALLEY FORGE MILITARY ACADEMY AND COLLEGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR GRAYSON SCHOOL FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION AND RENOVATION OF MARPLE NEWTOWN SCHOOL DISTRICT BUILDINGSPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(D) DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AND POTENTIAL EXPANSION OF THE EASTERSEALS OF SOUTHEASTERN PA AT 468 MIDDLETOWN ROAD20250HB1331PN2389 - 295 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AND POTENTIAL EXPANSION OF THE WAYNE ART CENTER IN RADNOR TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(II.2) CITY OF CHESTER(A) INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CHESTER CITY FIRE DEPARTMENT BUILDING RENOVATIONSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(II.3) EDDYSTONE BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO THE IMPROVEMENT AND/OR EXPANSION OF FACILITIES AT PENN TERMINALSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II.4) MEDIA BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS TO SUSTAIN AND INCREASE THE QUALITY OF OUR BUSINESS DISTRICT AND QUALITY OF LIFE IN MEDIA BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 296 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II.5) TRAINER BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN BY MONROE ENERGYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(II.6) CONCORD TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A CIVIC, HISTORICAL, CULTURAL OR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN CONCORD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(iii) Haverford Township(A) Construction and other related costs for Brookline ParkProject Allocation 500,000(iv) Marple Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, and other costs associated with repairing the brick facade at St. Pius X Catholic Church and SchoolProject Allocation 6,100,000(IV.1) MIDDLETOWN TOWNSHIP20250HB1331PN2389 - 297 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE ROOSEVELT COMMUNITY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(v) Radnor Township(A) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for projects in Fenimore Woods ParkProject Allocation 700,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for projects relating to Radnor Township BuildingProject Allocation 500,000(C) Upgrades and deferred maintenance, Phase VII, for North Wayne flood mitigationProject Allocation 550,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS RELATING TO CREUTZBERG CENTER (PHASE II)PROJECT ALLOCATION 2,450,000(V.1) TINICUM TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 298 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(vi) Upper Providence Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, and other related costs for the Benchmark SchoolProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition and other related costs to construct a multiuse building for the Department of Public WorksProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition and other related costs for a community roomProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation, construction and other related costs for Louis Scott Memorial ParkProject Allocation 500,000(E) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs to sustain and increase the quality of life in Upper Providence TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) Construction, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 299 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation, rehabilitation, redevelopment and other related costs to expand a township municipal buildingProject Allocation 5,000,000(24) Elk County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction and other costs related to the Abbott Furnace expansionProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, abatement of hazardous materials, renovation and/or other costs for redevelopment projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(ii) Ridgway Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment and/or other costs related to the renovation of a building for social services in the regionProject Allocation 2,000,000(25) Erie County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 300 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redevelopment and other related costs for Zurn Elkay Water SolutionsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY IMPROVEMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND COMMUNITY GROWTH INITIATIVESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AT THE MERCY CENTER FOR WOMENPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II) ERIE COUNTY GENERAL AUTHORITY(A) FOR THE ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE AND CONSTRUCTION OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND PUBLIC WORKS BUILDINGS IN THE CITY OF ERIE20250HB1331PN2389 - 301 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, RENOVATION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN ERIE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN INDUSTRIAL AND BUSINESS PARK WITHIN ERIE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS AT GANNON UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(III) MILLCREEK TOWNSHIP GENERAL AUTHORITY(A) ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO PROMOTE BUSINESS EXPANSION AND REDEVELOPMENT WITHIN MILLCREEK TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(ii) (IV) North East Community Authority(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for a comprehensive rehabilitation of the North East Marina, including dredging and fixing 20250HB1331PN2389 - 302 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the marina wall and upgrades to the slips, fuel dock and other facilitiesProject Allocation 15,000,000(V) REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY OF ERIE(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR EXPANSION OF LAKE ERIE COLLEGE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE, INCLUDING NEW BUILDINGS AND FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE ERIE ZOOPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION AND CONSTRUCTION OF ADVANCED TECHNOLOGY AGRICULTURE PRODUCTION FACILITY IN ERIE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT, REHABILITATION AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REVITALIZATION EFFORTS THAT PROMOTE INVESTMENT AND ECONOMIC GROWTH AS PRIORITIZED BY INFINITE ERIE'S INVESTMENT PLAYBOOK20250HB1331PN2389 - 303 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(VI) MILLCREEK TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE PENINSULA DRIVE MULTIPURPOSE TRAILPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(26) Fayette County (Reserved)(26) FAYETTE COUNTY(I) COUNTYWIDE(A) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(27) Forest County (Reserved)(28) Franklin County(i) County projects(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, remediation and/or other associated costs for the construction of a community and/or economic development project in Franklin CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(ii) Franklin County Area Development 20250HB1331PN2389 - 304 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Corporation(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to an economic development project within the Greencastle-Antrim School District or the Waynesboro Area School DistrictProject Allocation 5,000,000(iii) Antrim Township(A) For the site work, construction, infrastructure and costs associated with an economic development, healthcare or related projectProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Borough of Chambersburg(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other costs associated with the development of community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(v) Borough of Waynesboro(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for the renovation and/or construction of a community and/or economic development 20250HB1331PN2389 - 305 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(vi) Greene Township(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for the construction of a community and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure and/or other associated costs for the development of the Letterkenny Sports ComplexProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Guilford Township(A) Construction, infrastructure and/or other costs related to the building of a training house to be used for fire, EMS and police training exercisesProject Allocation 2,000,000(viii) Quincy Township(A) Site work, construction and/or other associated costs related to upgrades to municipal buildingsProject Allocation 500,000(ix) Washington Township(A) Acquisition, site development, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 306 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, construction, abatement, equipment and other related costs for a community or economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(X) COUNTYWIDE(A) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(29) Fulton County (Reserved)(30) Greene County (Reserved)(31) Huntingdon County (Reserved)(32) Indiana County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, rehabilitation, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for industrial building development projectsProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, abatement, renovation, rehabilitation, redevelopment, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for economic development projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Acquisition, rehabilitation, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 307 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for community/economic development revitalization and blight-related projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) Acquisition, rehabilitation, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for business park development projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Acquisition, rehabilitation, renovations, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for building revitalization projects, including historical structuresProject Allocation 10,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN INDIANA COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(33) Jefferson County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 308 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation and/or other related costs for a visitor's centerProject Allocation 500,000(B) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs to develop a new space for Jefferson County Domestic Relations and Magisterial District Judge 54-3-03Project Allocation 1,000,000(C) Construction, renovation and/or other related costs for a new 911 centerProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Acquisition, abatement, renovation, rehabilitation, redevelopment, infrastructure improvements, construction and related costs for economic development projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(ii) Brookville Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, renovation, redevelopment, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for community revitalization and economic development projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Construction, renovation and/or other related costs to address safety 20250HB1331PN2389 - 309 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 concerns at Jefferson County facilities, including steps to the courthouse and sidewalks in front of the courthouse and Jefferson PlaceProject Allocation 1,000,000(34) Juniata County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other costs related to economic developmentProject Allocation 10,000,000(35) Lackawanna County(i) County projects(A) Construction, infrastructure, improvements, acquisition, renovations, abatement and other related costs for an economic or community development project in the countyProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, renovation, infrastructure and other costs related to properties owned or to be acquired by the Fellowship House FoundationProject Allocation 4,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 310 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MULTI-USE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT LOCATED IN THE 200 BLOCK OF WYOMING AVENUE IN THE CITY OF SCRANTONPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR LAKELAND SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HEALTH CARE AND HOSPITAL PROJECTS IN LACKAWANNA COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 75,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 311 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I.1) REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY OF LACKAWANNA COUNTY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SCRANTON SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(ii) City of Carbondale(A) Acquisition, construction, renovation, infrastructure and other costs related to properties owned or to be acquired by Carbondale Development Partners II, LLCProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(iii) City of Scranton(A) Acquisition, construction, renovation, infrastructure and other costs related to the Medical Arts Building located at 327 N. Washington Avenue, Scranton, Pennsylvania20250HB1331PN2389 - 312 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A CAMPUS IMPROVEMENT PROJECT FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF SCRANTONPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE RENOVATION OR DEVELOPMENT OF UNIVERSITY OF SCRANTON ATHLETIC FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, EQUIPMENT, REHABILITATION, DEMOLITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR JOHNSON COLLEGEPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 313 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HISTORIC NEIGHBORHOOD DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN THE PLOT SECTION OF SCRANTONPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(IV) ARCHBALD BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(V) BLAKELY BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A COMMUNITY AND RECREATION CENTER20250HB1331PN2389 - 314 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VI) CLARKS GREEN BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(VII) CLARKS SUMMIT BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(VIII) DICKSON CITY BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR LACKAWANNA 20250HB1331PN2389 - 315 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EXECUTIVE PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,500,000(IX) DUNMORE BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(X) JERMYN BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XI) JESSUP BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XII) MAYFIELD BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 316 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XIII) OLYPHANT BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(iv) (XIV) Taylor Borough(A) Construction and infrastructure related to Schiff's Food Service, Inc., warehouse expansionProject Allocation 1,750,000(XV) THROOP BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XVI) VANDLING BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 317 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XVII) CARBONDALE TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XVIII) FELL TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XIX) JEFFERSON TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XX) NORTH ABINGTON TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 318 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XXI) SOUTH ABINGTON TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(XXII) WAVERLY TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATIONS, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT THE WAVERLY COMMUNITY HOUSEPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,663,000(36) Lancaster County(i) County projects(A) Design, demolition, abatement of 20250HB1331PN2389 - 319 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazardous materials, extensions or upgrading of utilities, site grading, construction of new space, facade preservation, fit-out of existing space, infrastructure upgrade and other related costs in Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure, and/or other associated costs for a United Disabilities Services Foundation project in Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, machinery, equipment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for development projects at Franklin and Marshall College in Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH DEVELOPMENT OF A UNITED DISABILITIES SERVICES FOUNDATION RECUPERATIVE CARE FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 320 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN MANHEIM TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN MANHEIM TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ROADWAY AND UTILITY IMPROVEMENTS, STREETSCAPE ENHANCEMENTS AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW POLICE STATION AND ADMINISTRATION BUILDING IN MANHEIM TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 321 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT ALONG CORPORATE BOULEVARD IN WEST HEMPFIELD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(I) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN EAST HEMPFIELD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(J) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT ALONG HOLLAND STREET IN EAST HEMPFIELD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,000,000(K) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT ON OR RELATED TO THE THADDEUS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 322 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(L) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FOR A COMPANY INVOLVED WITH RUBBER RECLAMATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(M) DESIGN, DEMOLITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, EXTENSIONS OR UPGRADING OF UTILITIES, SITE GRADING, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW SPACE, FACADE PRESERVATION, FIT-OUT OF EXISTING SPACE, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DART CONTAINER CORPORATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(N) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO THE IMPROVEMENT OF A DIRECT WIRE AND CABLE FACILITY IN LANCASTER COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(O) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 323 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN OZ FUND INC.-AFFILIATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, CULTURAL, HISTORICAL OR REVITALIZATION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(P) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN LANCASTER COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(Q) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Lancaster County Housing and Redevelopment Authority(A) Acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for economic development projects in Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 324 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Lititz Regional Community Development Corporation(A) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, for a community asset project in Elizabeth TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, for an economic development project in Elizabeth TownshipProject Allocation 30,000,000(C) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, for a community asset project in Lititz BoroughProject Allocation 15,000,000(D) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other 20250HB1331PN2389 - 325 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs, including equipment and machinery, for an economic development project in Lititz BoroughProject Allocation 30,000,000(E) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, related to redevelopment of properties situated between North Broad Street and North Cedar Street adjacent to the Norfolk Southern rail line in Lititz BoroughProject Allocation 20,000,000(F) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, for an economic development project in Warwick TownshipProject Allocation 30,000,000(G) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including equipment and machinery, for a community asset project in Warwick Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 326 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 15,000,000(iv) City of Lancaster(A) Construction, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs associated with renovations to the YWCA in Lancaster CityProject Allocation 7,600,000(B) Construction, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs to renovate Price Elementary SchoolProject Allocation 12,500,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the Wheatland Avenue Habitat CondominiumsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials, machinery and equipment and other related costs for public works infrastructureProject Allocation 4,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials, machinery and equipment for capital improvements and expansion of amenities at the Conestoga Pines Park 20250HB1331PN2389 - 327 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and SE ParksProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Acquisition, infrastructure, remediation, abatement of hazardous materials, renovation, construction and other costs related to the development and expansion of multimodal transportation safety initiativesProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(H) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE YFORWARD PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,789,000(I) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MIXED-USE DEVELOPMENT ON STEVENS AVENUEPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,500,000(v) Ephrata Borough(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 328 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation activities related to the development of a civic and/or economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(vi) East Hempfield Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to improve or expand United Disabilities Services Foundation facilities in East Hempfield TownshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(vii) Manheim Township(A) Design, construction, infrastructure and related costs for Phase II and Phase III of Overlook Community Park master planProject Allocation 1,500,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other associated costs, including machinery and equipment, related to the construction of a new police station and administration building in Manheim Township, Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 20,000,000(C) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 329 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including machinery and equipment, for a community asset project in Manheim Township, Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 15,000,000(D) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including machinery and equipment, for an economic development project in Manheim Township, Lancaster CountyProject Allocation 30,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR CAPITAL PROJECT UNDERTAKEN BY ARCONIC, INC., AT ITS LANCASTER FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(VII.1) MILLERSVILLE BOROUGH(A) REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR MIXED-USE DEVELOPMENT AND HOUSING 20250HB1331PN2389 - 330 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(viii) Penn Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, infrastructure, remediation, renovation, construction and/or other related costs associated with the development and/or expansion of a wheat and rye processing facilityProject Allocation 4,000,000(37) Lawrence County(i) Lawrence County Economic Development Corporation(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for arts and cultural institutions in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 8,000,000(B) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for public services buildings in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 2,500,000(C) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for libraries in Lawrence County20250HB1331PN2389 - 331 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(D) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for hospitals, medical centers and public services facilities in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for downtown redevelopment and revitalization in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 7,500,000(F) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for industrial development in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for commercial development in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other 20250HB1331PN2389 - 332 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs for the development of an industrial multitenant facility in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 3,500,000(I) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs for brownfield redevelopment in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(J) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs of development associated with agriculture processors in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(K) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs of development associated with institutions of higher education in Lawrence CountyProject Allocation 8,000,000(L) Acquisition, infrastructure, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials, construction and other related costs of industrial/commercial development or revitalization in Mahoning Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 333 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 15,000,000(38) Lebanon County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, site preparation, remediation, infrastructure, construction and/or renovation activities related to the development and/or redevelopment of a large-scale industrial site and/or facilityProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT ON WEST WASHINGTON AVENUE IN MYERSTOWNPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(ii) City of Lebanon(A) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, infrastructure, new construction for activities related to a neighborhood revitalization strategy, both commercial and residential, from Cumberland Street to Maple Street and 5th Avenue West to 12th StreetProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Acquisition, demolition, new 20250HB1331PN2389 - 334 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, infrastructure, remediation for housing and other development projects in the City of Lebanon in coordination with the City of Lebanon Land Bank and/or the Lebanon County Redevelopment Authority Project Allocation 5,000,000(C) Acquisition, design, demolition, redevelopment, construction, infrastructure and other costs related to housing and other economic developmentProject Allocation 3,600,000(39) Lehigh County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, site preparation, remediation, infrastructure, construction and/or renovation activities related to the development and/or redevelopment of a large-scale industrial site and/or facility in Lehigh CountyProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ALLENTOWN ART MUSEUM EXPANSION AND RENOVATION PROJECT20250HB1331PN2389 - 335 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF COUNTY-OWNED SKILLED NURSING FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT IN LEHIGH VALLEY INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT TO SUPPORT REGIONAL ECONOMIC GROWTHPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS AT THE LEHIGH VALLEY ZOOPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(I.1) REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY OF LEHIGH COUNTY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT ALONG ROUTE 145PROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(I.2) WHITEHALL TOWNSHIP INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REUSE OF THE FORMER DENT HARDWARE FACTORYPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 336 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) City of Allentown(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment and related assistance for creation of a trucking parking lot Project Allocation 500,000(B) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, renovations, upgrades and other related costs to a youth facility/community center in central AllentownProject Allocation 7,500,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, renovations, upgrades and other related costs for rehabilitation of the former historic Liberty Bell site in downtown AllentownProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW POLICE TRAINING ACADEMYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A HIGHER EDUCATION FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR JEWISH COMMUNITY 20250HB1331PN2389 - 337 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CENTER CAMPUS AND FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITY OWNED BY ALLENTOWN BANDPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(H) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES TO FACILITIES WITHIN THE ALLENTOWN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(iii) Salisbury Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the Lehigh Valley Hospital Cedar Crest Campus to expand the Children's HospitalProject Allocation 20,000,000(IV) SOUTH WHITEHALL TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF CULTURAL, CIVIC, HISTORIC PROJECT IN SOUTH WHITEHALL TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,250,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 338 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN SOUTH WHITEHALL TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF FIRE AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(V) UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF POLICE AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 9,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF FIRE AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF TOWNSHIP ADMINISTRATIVE AND OPERATIONS FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 339 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR SOCIAL SERVICES FACILITY IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION FACILITY IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING FACILITY IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF INDUSTRIAL PROJECT IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(H) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF MIXED-USE FACILITY IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIP20250HB1331PN2389 - 340 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(I) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF PARKS AND RECREATION FACILITIES IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(J) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF HEALTH CARE FACILITIES IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(K) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT AND RENOVATION/REHABILITATION OF CULTURAL, CIVIC AND HISTORIC PROJECT IN UPPER MACUNGIE TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,250,000(40) Luzerne County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic 20250HB1331PN2389 - 341 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including machinery and equipment, for a project at the Hazleton Area School DistrictProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN LUZERNE COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) CAN DO, Inc.(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the CrossRoads East economic development project and surrounding 20250HB1331PN2389 - 342 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lands in Hazle TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(iii) The Greater Wilkes-Barre Industrial Fund(A) Acquisition, construction, renovation, infrastructure and other costs related to properties owned or to be acquired by True North of NEPA, LLCProject Allocation 3,500,000(III.1) LUZERNE COUNTY REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE WEINBERG NORTHEAST PENNSYLVANIA REGIONAL FOOD BANK AND ITS MEMBER AGENCIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(iv) City of Nanticoke(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(v) City of Pittston(A) Acquisition, construction, site 20250HB1331PN2389 - 343 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for community revitalization and economic development projects at 234 N. Main StreetProject Allocation 2,600,000(V.1) CITY OF WILKES-BARRE(A) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR RENOVATION ACTIVITIES RELATED TO THE IMPROVEMENT AND/OR EXPANSION OF FACILITIES FOR WILKES UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, SITE AND INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION, RELOCATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IMPACTING SOCIAL SERVICE NEEDS PROVIDED BY VOLUNTEERS OF AMERICA OF PENNSYLVANIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, EQUIPMENT, REHABILITATION, DEMOLITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR MATERNAL AND FAMILY HEALTH SERVICESPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 344 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, EQUIPMENT, REHABILITATION, DEMOLITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CHILDREN'S SERVICES CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(vi) Edwardsville Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Exeter Borough(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for main streetscape and commercial developmentProject Allocation 2,500,000(viii) Forty Fort Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the redevelopment of land for the headquarters of Forty Fort Public Works and the West Side Council of Governments20250HB1331PN2389 - 345 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(ix) Kingston Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Construction, renovation and other related costs for redeveloping Church Street and other Kingston Borough parksProject Allocation 750,000(C) Redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for redeveloping Riverbend Park areaProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(F) Construction, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 346 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation and other related costs for the redevelopment of blighted property Project Allocation 1,500,000(x) Luzerne Borough(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for economic development projects in the historic and business districtsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xi) Swoyersville Borough(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for mixed-use housing and commercial developmentProject Allocation 7,500,000(xii) West Hazleton Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(xiii) Wyoming Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and other related costs for redeveloping Wyoming Borough's economic and historic districtProject Allocation 2,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 347 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xiv) Hanover Township(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic development projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 2,500,000(xv) Hazle Township(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for a new ambulatory health care campus for Lehigh Valley Health NetworkProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Demolition, construction, infrastructure, renovation and/or other costs associated with the demolition of an existing hotel and construction of a Country Inn & Suites HotelProject Allocation 5,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 348 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 3,000,000(xvi) Jenkins Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, and other related costs for the CenterPoint East Expansion economic development project Project Allocation 2,600,000(xvii) Rice Township(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(XVII.1) WHITEHALL TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, DESIGN, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR A RECREATION AND LIFESTYLE FACILITY IN WHITEHALL TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(xviii) Wright Township(A) Acquisition, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 349 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site preparation and other related costs associated with an economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(41) Lycoming County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND COMMUNITY GROWTH INITIATIVESPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW BUILDING AND EXPANSION OF EXISTING FACILITIES AT THE PENNSYLVANIA COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (II) City of Williamsport(A) Acquisition, reclamation, infrastructure improvements and construction to land and facilities at the Pennsylvania College of Technology in the city of WilliamsportProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 350 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation, redevelopment, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for community revitalization and economic development projectsProject Allocation 20,000,000(42) McKean County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, construction and other related costs for a health care facility that will provide maternal care, including childbirth servicesProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, infrastructure, construction, redevelopment or other related costs for a housing or economic development projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF PITTSBURGH AT BRADFORD, INCLUDING RENOVATION AND REHABILITATION OF EXISTING FACILITIES AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION, EXPANSION 20250HB1331PN2389 - 351 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS AT BRADFORD REGIONAL MEDICAL CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DESIGN, ENGINEERING, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO BUILD A COMMUNITY HOSPITALPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(ii) City of Bradford(A) Renovation of an existing building for a new police station facility and the construction of a new fire station to replace antiquated and undersized facilitiesProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, demolition, infrastructure and other related costs for the University of Pittsburgh at Bradford, including renovation and rehabilitation of existing facilities and construction of new facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) (B) Acquisition, demolition, construction, renovation and other related costs associated with improvements to the Marilyn Horne Hall Building and affiliated parking lots at the University of Pittsburgh at BradfordProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 352 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) (C) Acquisition of property, demolition, renovation, construction and other related costs, including related infrastructure improvements, for the development of housingProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) (D) Renovation or replacement of the swimming pool, splash pad and adjoining bathhouse facility along with the renovation of other recreational facilities in Callahan Park and improvements to the recreational facilities at Kessel FieldProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) (E) Acquisition, demolition, renovation, construction and other related costs associated with the development of a soccer/lacrosse stadium, press box, concession, locker room facility and field house, field lighting and roadway improvements located at the Kessel Athletic ComplexProject Allocation 10,000,000(G) (F) Property acquisition and building renovation/construction related to the development of the Triangle Works Collaborative, LLC, McKean County Incubator-Accelerator facility in the City of Bradford20250HB1331PN2389 - 353 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(H) (G) Acquisition of land and/or buildings, capital building improvements, including construction or renovation, and infrastructure and site development costs to promote economic development, community development, downtown revitalization, recreation and health care needsProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) Port Allegany Borough(A) Acquisition and other costs associated with the relocation of all utility infrastructure related to the construction of a leveeProject Allocation 1,750,000(43) Mercer County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, SITE DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS OF A PROJECT FOR THE NATIONAL ELECTRICAL CONTRACTORS ASSOCIATION AND ITS MEMBERSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION 20250HB1331PN2389 - 354 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (II) Penn Northwest Development Corporation(A) Construction, infrastructure, machinery and/or other costs related to a facility expansion, development of a GCFU molding machine, material handling system and two compounding lines for MoxieTec in Pine TownshipProject Allocation 11,850,000(ii) (III) Clark Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate the municipal and fire department buildingsProject Allocation 10,000,000(IV) GREENVILLE BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, ACQUISITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE TRINITY NORTH AREA OF THE BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(44) Mifflin County (Reserved)(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 355 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MULTI-USE FACILITY OWNED AND OPERATED BY LEWISTOWN BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN MIFFLIN COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II) LEWISTOWN BOROUGH(A) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE SALVATION ARMY LEWISTOWN CORPS SITE, INCLUDING PARKING AREA AND CAMPUS IMPROVEMENTPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,500,000(45) Monroe County(i) Monroe County Industrial Development Authority(A) Construction, infrastructure and/or other costs related to renovations for the Pleasant Valley School District in Chestnuthill Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 356 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,000,000(I.1) EAST STROUDSBURG BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF A VACANT MEDICAL BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 13,500,000(ii) Stroudsburg Borough(A) Acquisition, construction, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for community revitalization and economic development projects in Stroudsburg BoroughProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, construction, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for renovation of Stroudsburg Borough HallProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MIXED-USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 16,148,000(D) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REDEVELOPMENT OF A 20250HB1331PN2389 - 357 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FORMER HOTEL SITEPROJECT ALLOCATION 27,700,000(46) Montgomery County(i) County projects(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate the Montgomery County 4-H facilityProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Abatement, site work, acquisition, construction, infrastructure and redevelopment assistance, environmental remediation and other related costs for the redevelopment of Elmwood Park ZooProject Allocation 30,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to redevelop, reconstruct and recreate Methacton High SchoolProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to redevelop, reconstruct and recreate the La Salle College High School campusProject Allocation 20,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 358 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Acquisition, demolition, site infrastructure, including grading, environmental, site and civil engineering, architectural design, mechanical, electrical, plumbing, and structural engineering, development fees, storm water, E&S controls, paving, concrete curbing, concrete sidewalks, site lighting, new water and sewer lines, new gas lines, new site electric, electrical substation and telecommunication infrastructure, including new fiber lines, for Montgomery County supporting infrastructureProject Allocation 75,000,000(F) Acquisition, site preparation, renovation, construction, infrastructure and other associated costs for the improvement, expansion, redevelopment and revitalization of a Nemours Children's Health System pediatric facility located in Montgomery CountyProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY20250HB1331PN2389 - 359 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 100,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MIXED-USE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN MONTGOMERY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(I) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAMPUS RENOVATION AND MISCELLANEOUS IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS IN THE JENKINTOWN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 17,000,000(J) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT AT GWYN NOR ELEMENTARY SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 21,562,000(K) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT AT OAK PARK ELEMENTARY SCHOOL20250HB1331PN2389 - 360 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 16,641,000(L) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ELEMENTARY SCHOOL PLAYGROUND PROJECTS IN THE NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,117,000(M) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICT HIGH SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 259,562,000(N) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO IMPROVING OR CREATING AN SPCA FACILITY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(O) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE MODERNIZATION OF THE NORRISTOWN PUBLIC LIBRARYPROJECT ALLOCATION 28,060,000(P) DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 361 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF CAMP RAINBOW IN SCHWENKSVILLEPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(Q) RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT ELEMENTARY SCHOOLS IN THE NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,059,000(R) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Montgomery County Redevelopment Authority(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for the redevelopment and improvement of the Norristown State Hospital property and its immediate surrounding areaProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 362 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations to the Lansdale HospitalProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT OF SPORTS COMPLEXESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) LAND ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, DEMOLITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, RENOVATION, ADDITION, UTILITY EXPANSION, CONSTRUCTION, PURCHASE OF MEDICAL EQUIPMENT AND FIXTURES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES OF MAIN LINE HOSPITALS, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REMEDIATION AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO A PROJECT IN MONTGOMERY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(F) SITE PREPARATION, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE EXPANSION OF THE MARTIN LUTHER SCHOOL IN MONTGOMERY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 363 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW HOSPITAL TOWER AT POTTSTOWN HOSPITALPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(iii) Abington Township Economic Development Corporation(A) Acquisition, construction, site development, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, equipment and other related costs for community revitalization and economic development projects in Abington TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(III.1) CHELTENHAM COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, SITE DEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND EQUIPMENT PURCHASES FOR COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS WITHIN CHELTENHAM TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(III.2) FRANCONIA SEWER AUTHORITY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 364 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR THE CREATION OF A REGIONAL WASTEWATER AUTHORITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(III.3) BRIDGEPORT BOROUGH(A) INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, DEMOLITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A PUBLIC SAFETY ANNEXPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(iv) Conshohocken Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure and redevelopment of a borough public safety buildingProject Allocation 5,000,000(IV.1) HATFIELD BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE HATFIELD TRAIN STATION AND ADJACENT PARCELSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(v) Jenkintown Borough(A) Construction, acquisition, redevelopment, infrastructure and other related costs for the Jenkintown School District to renovate recently acquired propertyProject Allocation 17,000,000(V.1) LANSDALE BOROUGH(A) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 365 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICT OAK PARK ELEMENTARY SCHOOL UPGRADESPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,320,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO LANSDALE JEFFERSON HOSPITALPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE FORMER AMERICAN OLEAN TILE FACTORY SITEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A PERFORMING ART, FILM AND MUSIC VENUE INCLUDING HOUSING IN LANSDALE BOROUGHPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE HILLCREST SHOPPING CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 366 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR 421 W. MAIN STREETPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(G) CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A FACILITY EXPANSION AT MITZVAH CIRCLEPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(vi) Norristown Borough(A) Construction, redevelopment and other related costs for renovations and construction of portions of the historic Centre TheaterProject Allocation 1,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(C) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ADAPTIVE REUSE OF THE HISTORIC AIRY STREET PRISON AND ADJACENT PARKING LOT20250HB1331PN2389 - 367 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(vii) Pennsburg Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the renovation and improvement of the Pennsburg Borough Hall building and the municipal garageProject Allocation 976,000(VII.1) POTTSTOWN BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, EQUIPMENT PURCHASES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC GROWTH INITIATIVESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(viii) Trappe Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the construction of a welcome center and museum collections facility Project Allocation 3,000,000(ix) West Conshohocken Borough(A) Site infrastructure, construction, renovation and other related costs, including acquisition, grading, environmental, site and civil engineering, architectural design, mechanical, electrical, plumbing, and structural engineering, development fees, storm water, E&S controls, paving, concrete curbing, concrete 20250HB1331PN2389 - 368 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sidewalks, site lighting, new water and sewer lines, new site electric, electrical substation and telecommunication infrastructure, including new fiber lines, building core and shell infrastructure, including building structure and exterior shell, mechanical, electrical and plumbing systems, elevators and standby power systemsProject Allocation 60,000,000(x) Abington Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and other related costs for improvement projects at Abington HospitalProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for renovations and upgrades to the Abington Township Police Department's training facilityProject Allocation 4,000,000(xi) Cheltenham Township(A) Construction, infrastructure improvements, development and other related costs for the MossSMART Center at Einstein Medical Center in Elkins ParkProject Allocation 5,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 369 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Construction, infrastructure, rehabilitation, acquisition, renovation and other related costs for the Cheltenham Township Administration Services BuildingProject Allocation 2,500,000(C) Construction and other related costs for Conklin Pool in Cheltenham TownshipProject Allocation 2,000,000(D) Construction, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Cheltenham Township Emergency Medical Services BuildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Construction and other related costs for the Glenside Community CenterProject Allocation 1,000,000(F) Construction and other related costs for Glenside Pool in Cheltenham TownshipProject Allocation 2,000,000(G) Construction and other related costs for the Cheltenham LibraryProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Construction and other related costs for the Cheltenham Police DepartmentProject Allocation 2,500,000(I) Construction and other related costs for the Cheltenham Public Works 20250HB1331PN2389 - 370 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FacilityProject Allocation 2,000,000(J) Construction and other related costs for the Rowland Community CenterProject Allocation 2,500,000(K) Construction, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the LaMott A Fire CompanyProject Allocation 2,000,000PROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(xii) Douglass Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and/or other costs related to the Douglas Township Administration Building renovation projectProject Allocation 1,500,000(xiii) East Norriton Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate a firehouseProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) Franconia Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation and/or other costs related to the Memory Care Household Model at Peter Becker Community projectProject Allocation 6,250,000(XIV.1) HATFIELD TOWNSHIP20250HB1331PN2389 - 371 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A NEW HEADQUARTERS FOR VMSC EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICESPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HEADQUARTERS FOR THE TWIN WOODS PROPERTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(xv) Limerick Township(A) Demolition, site preparation, construction, infrastructure, rehabilitation equipment and other related costs for the expansion of a Pharmaceutical Product and Technology Development and Commercial Manufacturing CenterProject Allocation 10,000,000(xvi) Lower Frederick Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to upgrade and renovate the Lower Frederick Fire Company buildingProject Allocation 5,000,000(xvii) Lower Gwynedd Township20250HB1331PN2389 - 372 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, renovations, rehabilitation and other related costs for Gwynedd Mercy University's campusProject Allocation 12,500,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition and other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 14,000,000(xviii) Lower Merion Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, improvements, renovations, upgrades, environmental remediation, repairs and other related costs for the redevelopment of Rosemont CollegeProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure and redevelopment of the Merion Mercy AcademyProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND/OR RENOVATION ACTIVITIES RELATED TO THE IMPROVEMENT AND/OR EXPANSION OF FACILITIES AT SAINT JOSEPH'S UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 373 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PUBLIC WORKS AND EMERGENCY SERVICE OPERATIONAL UPGRADESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(xix) Lower Moreland Township(A) Infrastructure, construction and other related costs for the construction of a new fire station for the Fetters Mill Fire RescueProject Allocation 10,000,000(xx) Lower Providence Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to support improvements and upgrades for the Arc AllianceProject Allocation 1,000,000(XX.1) MONTGOMERY TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES TO THE MONTGOMERY TOWNSHIP FIRE HOUSEPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,500,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATION OF A HISTORIC FARMHOUSE AT WINDLESTRAE PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 374 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A BANDSHELL IN MONTGOMERY TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(D) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A PUBLIC WORKS BUILDING IN MONTGOMERY TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000(E) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR REDEVELOPMENT OF THE MONTGOMERY MALL PROPERTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HEADQUARTERS FOR THE MONTGOMERY TOWNSHIP FIRE SERVICESPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATION AND/OR CONSTRUCTION OF A PUBLIC WORKS BUILDINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(XX.2) PLYMOUTH TOWNSHIP(A) SITE INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING ACQUISITION, GRADING, ENVIRONMENTAL, SITE AND CIVIL ENGINEERING, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 375 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ARCHITECTURAL DESIGN, MECHANICAL, ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING AND STRUCTURAL ENGINEERING, DEVELOPMENT FEES, STORMWATER, E&S CONTROLS, PAVING, CONCRETE CURBING, CONCRETE SIDEWALKS, SITE LIGHTING, NEW SITE ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, ELECTRICAL SUBSTATION AND POWER GENERATION INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING STANDBY POWER GENERATION FOR A PROJECT AT INNOVATION 900PROJECT ALLOCATION 60,000,000(XX.3) SOUDERTON BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HEADQUARTERS FOR THE KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(xxi) Springfield Township(A) Construction, redevelopment and other related costs for the Springfield Township Recreation CenterProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR MOUNT ST. JOSEPH ACADEMY CAMPUS IMPROVEMENTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(xxii) Towamencin Township(A) Construction and other related costs 20250HB1331PN2389 - 376 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for Veterans Memorial ParkProject Allocation 1,250,000(B) Construction and other related costs for pickleball courts at Butch Clemens ParkProject Allocation 500,000(C) Construction and other related costs for the Central Drive storm sewer projectProject Allocation 600,000(D) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for the Towamencin Fire Company building improvementsProject Allocation 1,200,000(E) RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES TO THE NORTH PENN HIGH SCHOOL IN THE NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 130,000,000(xxiii) Upper Gwynedd Township(A) Acquisition, construction, renovation, rehabilitation and related costs for the Jaisohn Community Wellness PlazaProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 377 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR NORTH PENN SCHOOL DISTRICT GWYN NOR ELEMENTARY SCHOOL UPGRADESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,781,000(xxiv) Upper Merion Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs to support the development and redevelopment of The Discovery LabsProject Allocation 125,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 411 Swedeland RoadProject Allocation 48,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 3200 Horizon DriveProject Allocation 18,000,000(D) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 3400 Horizon DriveProject Allocation 15,000,000(E) Construction, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 378 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 2100 Renaissance BoulevardProject Allocation 20,000,000(F) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 2501 Renaissance BoulevardProject Allocation 40,000,000(G) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 2520 Renaissance BoulevardProject Allocation 6,000,000(H) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located at 2560 Renaissance BoulevardProject Allocation 5,000,000(I) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located on the 600 block of Schuylkill River RoadProject Allocation 50,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 379 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located in the 600 Block of Front StreetProject Allocation 60,000,000(K) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment, rehabilitation, renovation and other related costs for properties located in the 500 Block of Swedeland RoadProject Allocation 60,000,000(L) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A MUNICIPAL OWNED MULTIPURPOSE STADIUM FACILITY AND OUTDOOR MUSIC VENUEPROJECT ALLOCATION 75,000,000(M) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE KING OF PRUSSIA MULTIMODAL TRAIN NETWORKPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,500,000(N) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS AT THE MAURICE STEPHENS HOUSEPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(xxv) Upper Dublin Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs 20250HB1331PN2389 - 380 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for upgrades to Fairwold AcademyProject Allocation 2,500,000(XXV.1) UPPER MORELAND TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, SITE PREPARATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING, UTILITIES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT AND COMMON AREAS, AND ALL OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT, EXPANSION AND/OR REUSE OF UPPER MORELAND TOWNSHIP FACILITY PROJECT FOR EDUCATIONAL, CULTURAL AND/OR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES WITHIN MONTGOMERY COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(xxvi) Whitemarsh Township(A) Construction and infrastructure improvements related to the Miquon School's redevelopment and expansionProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxvii) Worcester Township(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the renovation 20250HB1331PN2389 - 381 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and expansion of the Variety, the Children's Charity of the Delaware Valley campusProject Allocation 10,000,000(47) Montour County(i) County projects(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for economic and community development projectsProject Allocation 25,000,000(48) Northampton County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MULTI-USE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN NORTHAMPTON COUNTY AT THE SITE OF THE FORMER BETHLEHEM STEEL FACTORYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR PROJECT OF EASTON20250HB1331PN2389 - 382 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY CENTER THAT INCLUDES GYMNASIUM, EDUCATIONAL/HEAD START SPACE, COUNSELING CENTER, EVENT CENTER AND JOB TRAINING CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A MIXED-USE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN NORTHAMPTON COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (I.1) City of Easton(A) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other costs associated with renovating the 6th Street Fire StationProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other costs associated with renovating the College Hill Fire Station20250HB1331PN2389 - 383 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(C) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other costs associated with renovating the South Side Fire StationProject Allocation 2,500,000(D) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other costs associated with the creation of a community centerProject Allocation 4,000,000(E) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for Shiloh CommonsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs to support a tourism facilityProject Allocation 10,000,000(G) Land acquisition, construction and other related costs to develop a full service community center in the city's West WardProject Allocation 4,000,000(H) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the Greater Community Empowerment CenterProject Allocation 5,500,000(I) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for a community 20250HB1331PN2389 - 384 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 centerProject Allocation 4,000,000(J) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CREATION OF A TRAILHEAD PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,250,000(K) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CREATION OF A BOAT LAUNCH AND SKATE PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,250,000(L) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, BUILDING MODIFICATIONS, RENOVATIONS, FIT-OUT, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO SUPPORT A CRITICAL TOURISM FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(ii) Wilson Borough(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation abatement of hazardous materials and other costs related to the redevelopment of the former Dixie Cup Site in Wilson BoroughProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, acquisition, redevelopment, renovation 20250HB1331PN2389 - 385 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and rehabilitation of the Dixie Cup Factory Redevelopment and New Life DistrictProject Allocation 25,000,000(III) PALMER TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE PALMER TOWNSHIP COMMUNITY POLICE STATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 16,300,000(49) Northumberland County (Reserved)(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(50) Perry County20250HB1331PN2389 - 386 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) County projects(A) Land acquisition, construction, infrastructure, development, design, equipment or other costs related to a medical facilityProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Land acquisition, construction, infrastructure, development, design, equipment, redevelopment, renovation and other costs related to an emergency services facilityProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Land acquisition, construction, infrastructure, development, design, equipment and other costs related to a multiuse municipal building, including training space and other eventsProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) Land acquisition, construction, infrastructure, development, design, equipment and other costs related to a hotel and conference centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(E) Land acquisition, construction, infrastructure, development, design, equipment or other costs related to a regional sports, recreational, health and wellness facilityProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) Acquisition of land, infrastructure, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 387 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development, redevelopment of a building site or building renovation, design, construction for site improvements and other related costs for housing facilities to serve seniors and/or those of low-to-moderate incomeProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition and other related development costs for a new Government CenterProject Allocation 10,000,000(H) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment or other related costs to improve downtown public spaces and amenities, assist land and business owners with facade and infrastructure, improvements to redevelop and/or rehabilitate business in the county's boroughsProject Allocation 5,000,000(51) Philadelphia County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF PENN MEDICINE AND THE 20250HB1331PN2389 - 388 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UNIVERSITY OF PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH SYSTEM FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (I.1) Philadelphia Authority for Industrial Development(A) Construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for repairs to the First Unitarian Church of PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SAINT MARK'S CHURCH MASTER PLAN HISTORIC PRESERVATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(I.2) PHILADELPHIA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, ACQUISITION, ABATEMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A HOTEL PROJECT ADJACENT TO THE STADIUM DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE 20250HB1331PN2389 - 389 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAFPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SAFE HAVENPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(D) RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO REVITALIZE BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS ON THE PROPERTY SITE OF PENN ALEXANDER SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(E) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH HOSPITAL IN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(ii) City of Philadelphia(A) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, renovation, environmental remediation, repair and other related costs for America250PA preparationProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Construction, infrastructure, renovations and other related costs for the Avenue of the Arts, Inc., to 20250HB1331PN2389 - 390 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintain, expand, repair and enhance South Broad Street in PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 50,000,000(C) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation, improvements, renovations, upgrades, environmental remediation, repairs and other related costs for the development of AHARI's Veterans Village housing projectProject Allocation 4,000,000(D) Demolition, acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other costs for Liddonfield revitalization, renovation and rehabilitation project Project Allocation 35,000,000(E) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment and infrastructure related to One River marinaProject Allocation 10,000,000(F) Redevelopment, infrastructure and other related costs for renovation of Russo Park in the City of Philadelphia Project Allocation 4,100,000(G) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for capital improvements and renovations to the St. Hubert High School buildings and campus at the Northeast Philadelphia campusProject Allocation 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 391 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (H) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs at FDR Park in South PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 20,000,000(I) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs at West Fairmount Park in West PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 8,000,000(J) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs at the R.W. Brown Boys & Girls Club in North Central PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 10,000,000(K) Construction, infrastructure, acquisition, redevelopment and other related costs for capital improvements and renovations to the Paul Robeson House and MuseumProject Allocation 1,500,000(L) Construction, infrastructure and related costs for improvements to Lee Cultural CenterProject Allocation 7,000,000(M) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for recreation center and playground improvements in PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 11,500,000(N) Acquisition, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 392 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, renovations and other related costs for Rhoads Industries industrial and manufacturing center at the Navy YardProject Allocation 50,000,000(O) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, renovations and other related costs for the Woodmere Art Museum restoration and expansion of the Frances M. Maguire HallProject Allocation 10,000,000(P) Construction, infrastructure, site preparation and other related costs to support the development of The African American Museum in PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 50,000,000(Q) Design, demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, construction, infrastructure upgrades, sidewalk and streetscape improvements and other related costs within an area bounded by 23rd Street, Market Street, Chestnut Street and previously vacated 24th Street in PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 20,000,000(R) Design, demolition and deconstruction of decommissioned equipment, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions or upgrading of utilities, site grading, storm water management, construction 20250HB1331PN2389 - 393 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of new space, renovation of existing space, infrastructure upgrades, installation of electric boilers, installation of an industrial scale heat pump complex and other related costs within an area bounded by: 39.942855, -75.190676; 39.9443160, -75.190155; 39.942541, -75.186930; 39.941051, -75.186806Project Allocation 15,000,000(S) Design, demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, construction, infrastructure and other related costs within an area bounded by D Street, E. Luzerne Street, E. Erie Ave, and I Street in PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 15,000,000(T) Modernization, construction, rehabilitation site work and other related costs for the retrofit, adaption of and improvements to the Inglis House Campus located at 2600 Belmont AvenueProject Allocation 20,000,000(U) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure and redevelopment for the Cottman/Edmund Revitalization ProjectProject Allocation 2,750,000(V) Construction, infrastructure and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 394 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs for renovations to the Lawncrest Recreation CenterProject Allocation 3,500,000(W) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other costs associated with Hispanic North Philadelphia community improvements and institutional growthProject Allocation 10,000,000(X) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs to build the Philadelphia Museum of Sports in the Philadelphia Sports ComplexProject Allocation 5,000,000(Y) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for renovations the Weitzman Museum on Independence MallProject Allocation 10,000,000(Z) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the restoration of the Cobbs Creek Golf Course and surrounding areasProject Allocation 25,000,000(AA) Dredging and improvements of the ponds at Franklin Delano Roosevelt Park in the City of PhiladelphiaProject Allocation 3,000,000(BB) Acquisition, demolition, site preparation, renovation, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 395 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remediation, infrastructure and/or other associated costs to support Moore College's campus and facilitiesProject Allocation 10,000,000(CC) Renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for redevelopment at the National Constitution CenterProject Allocation 10,000,000(DD) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for Walnut Park PlazaProject Allocation 3,000,000(EE) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the expansion of Cornerstone Christian AcademyProject Allocation 5,000,000(FF) Construction, infrastructure and other related costs for improvements in the University City neighborhoodProject Allocation 30,000,000(GG) Construction, acquisition, abatement of hazardous materials and related costs for the Mummer's MuseumProject Allocation 2,500,000(HH) Land acquisition, site preparation, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for Thomas Jefferson University20250HB1331PN2389 - 396 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 30,000,000(II) Acquisition, abatement, infrastructure, construction, renovation and other related costs for the expansion of Thomas Jefferson University Hospital post-anesthesia care unitsProject Allocation 4,000,000(JJ) Acquisition, demolition, renovation, construction and other related costs for Thomas Jefferson University Hospital facilitiesProject Allocation 50,000,000(KK) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure improvements, redevelopment, renovation and related project costs at Temple University domestic campusesProject Allocation 50,000,000(LL) Construction, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation, rehabilitation, acquisition, infrastructure and other related costs for the Philadelphia Youth Orchestra Music InstituteProject Allocation 10,000,000(MM) Construction, renovation, infrastructure and other related costs for the Broad Street Love Building rehabilitation project20250HB1331PN2389 - 397 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(NN) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the Community College of Philadelphia capital facilities planProject Allocation 25,000,000(OO) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the Forman Arts Initiative community complexProject Allocation 20,000,000(PP) Construction, redevelopment and other related costs for the Barnes Foundation facility improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(QQ) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for capital needs at the Philadelphia ZooProject Allocation 15,000,000(RR) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the buildout of the University City Science Center campusProject Allocation 20,000,000(SS) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for redevelopment of the PHMC Public Health Campus on Cedar20250HB1331PN2389 - 398 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 40,000,000(TT) Construction, acquisition, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for the Wharton Piers waterfront development projectProject Allocation 25,000,000(UU) Construction, site preparation, expansion, infrastructure and other related costs for renovation of an apprenticeship school campus or academic facility located in the northeast section of Philadelphia containing zip code 19154 or 19114Project Allocation 10,000,000(VV) Construction, site preparation, expansion, infrastructure and other related costs for construction of a high school academic facility located in the northeast section of Philadelphia containing zip codes 19114, 19136, 19152 and/or 19154Project Allocation 5,000,000(WW) Construction, site preparation, expansion, infrastructure and other related costs for construction of a facility located in the northeast section of Philadelphia containing zip codes 19114 and/or 19154Project Allocation 10,000,000(XX) Acquisition, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 399 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rehabilitation, renovation, environmental and hazardous assessment remediation and other related costs for the development of industrial warehouse facilities located in the northeast section of Philadelphia containing zip codes 19114 and/or 19154Project Allocation 10,000,000(YY) Infrastructure and other related costs for upgrades at Reading Terminal MarketProject Allocation 5,000,000(ZZ) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS IN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 500,000,000(AAA) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE ATTIC YOUTH CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(BBB) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN IMPROVEMENT PROJECT AT A RECOVERY HIGH 20250HB1331PN2389 - 400 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(CCC) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE OUTDOOR CAMPUS AND THE INTERIOR BUILDINGS FOR THE WOODMERE ART MUSEUM RESTORATION AND EXPANSION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(DDD) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF BUILDINGS AND OUTDOOR FACILITIES AT THE SCHUYLKILL CENTER FOR ENVIRONMENTAL EDUCATION, RESTORATION AND EXPANSION PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 6,000,000(EEE) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RHOADS INDUSTRIES INDUSTRIAL MANUFACTURING CENTER AT THE NAVY YARDPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(FFF) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS TO THE SMITH MEMORIAL PLAYGROUND AND PLAYHOUSE IN FAIRMOUNT PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(GGG) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REHABILITATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 401 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PROJECTS AT THE SEDGWICK THEATERPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(HHH) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS TO THE SELF HELP MOVEMENT, INC BUILDINGS AND CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(III) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR REUSE OF BUILDINGS ON A FORMER HOSPITAL AND HOSPITAL CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(JJJ) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT AT THE 800 BLOCK OF GIRARD AVENUEPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(KKK) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 402 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR SETTLEMENT MUSIC SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(LLL) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT AT THE BETSY ROSS HOUSE IN CONJUNCTION WITH HISTORIC PHILADELPHIA, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(MMM) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR ANY TEMPLE HEALTH PROJECTS WITHIN PHILADELPHIA COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 100,000,000(NNN) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, SITE PREPARATION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL AND HAZARDOUS ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ORGANIZATION, ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION OF A PUBLIC AIR SHOW LOCATED AT THE 20250HB1331PN2389 - 403 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NORTHEAST PHILADELPHIA AIRPORT, 9800 ASHTON ROAD, PHILADELPHIA, PA 19114PROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(OOO) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE LUTHERAN THEOLOGICAL SEMINARY ON GERMANTOWN AVENUE IN PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(PPP) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO JEVS HUMAN SERVICES, ORLEANS TECHNICAL COLLEGE SITEPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(QQQ) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE SALVATION ARMY PHILADELPHIA CENTRAL CORPS SITE AT 3225 REED STREETPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(RRR) PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE SALVATION ARMY PHILADELPHIA TABERNACLE SITE AT 3150 N. MASCHER STREETPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 404 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (SSS) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND RELATED COSTS FOR THE REVITALIZATION OF THE SHOPPES AT LASALLE COMMUNITY SHOPPING CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(TTT) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE OVERBROOK SCHOOL FOR THE BLINDPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(UUU) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT AT THE QUARTERMASTER SCIENCE + TECHNOLOGY PARKPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(VVV) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, AND OTHER RELATED COSTS AT THE PHILADELPHIA WHOLESALE PRODUCE MARKETPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 405 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (WWW) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT FOR PATIENT CARE FACILITIES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR KENSINGTON HOSPITALPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(XXX) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT FOR PATIENT CARE FACILITIES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE MAZZONI CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(YYY) REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO REDEVELOPMENT OF THE PHILADELPHIA ORCHESTRA AND KIMMEL CENTER, INC., ACADEMY OF MUSICPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(ZZZ) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER COSTS RELATED TO FACILITY UPGRADES AT THE KIMMEL CENTER FOR THE PERFORMING ARTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(AAAA) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER COSTS FOR AN 20250HB1331PN2389 - 406 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UPGRADE PROJECT AT THE MILLER THEATER (FORMERLY MERRIAM THEATER) IMPROVEMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(BBBB) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT FOR PATIENT CARE FACILITIES AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR PHILADELPHIA FIGHTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(CCCC) DESIGN, DEMOLITION AND DECONSTRUCTION OF DECOMMISSIONED EQUIPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, EXTENSIONS OR UPGRADING OF UTILITIES, SITE GRADING, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW SPACE, RENOVATION OF EXISTING SPACE, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES, INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC BOILERS, INSTALLATION OF AN INDUSTRIAL-SCALE HEAT PUMP COMPLEX AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED BY THE SCHUYLKILL RIVER TO THE WEST AND THE CROSS STREETS OF CHRISTIAN STREET, GRAYS FERRY AVENUE, ELLSWORTH STREET, SOUTH 26TH STREET, AND SOUTH 28TH STREET, INCLUDING ADJACENT LOTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(DDDD) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 407 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR GIRARD COLLEGE FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(EEEE) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR WALNUT STREET THEATRE FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(FFFF) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SAFE HAVENPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(GGGG) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR SAFETY UPGRADES AND RENOVATIONS AT A COURT FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(HHHH) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, EQUIPMENT, REHABILITATION, DEMOLITION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE PHILADELPHIA BALLETPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(IIII) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER ASSOCIATED 20250HB1331PN2389 - 408 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COSTS FOR THE WILLIAM WAY LGBT COMMUNITY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(JJJJ) DESIGN, DEMOLITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, EXTENSIONS OR UPGRADING OF UTILITIES, SITE GRADING, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW SPACE, FACADE PRESERVATION, FIT-OUT OF EXISTING SPACE, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES, MANUFACTURING EXPANSION CAPACITY AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED BY D STREET, EAST ERIE AVENUE, EAST LUZERNE STREET AND I STREET, INCLUDING ADJACENT LOTS, IN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(KKKK) DEMOLITION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, OFFSITE INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES, ONSITE UTILITY UPGRADES, DESIGN, SITE GRADING, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW SPACE AND RELATED COSTS, WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED BY TORRESDALE AVENUE, RHAWN STREET, ASHBURNER STREET AND I-95, INCLUDING ADJACENT LOTS, WITHIN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 11,000,000(LLLL) DESIGN, SITE GRADING, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT, LANDSCAPING, EXTENSIONS AND UPGRADING OF UTILITIES ON AND OFF 20250HB1331PN2389 - 409 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SITE, CURBING, TRAFFIC SIGNALS, ROAD WIDENING, PAVING, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADE ON AND OFF SITE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED BY SOUTHAMPTON ROAD, ROOSEVELT BOULEVARD, SUNFLOWER DRIVE AND PAQUESSING CREEK, INCLUDING ADJACENT LOTS, WITHIN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIAPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(MMMM) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT THE DA VINCI ART ALLIANCEPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,250,000(NNNN) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SEDGLEY CHILDREN ZONEPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,300,000(OOOO) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MINORITY SMALL BUSINESS INCUBATORPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(PPPP) ACQUISITION, SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, REMEDIATION AND OTHER COSTS FOR THE BARTRAM'S GARDEN CAMPUS 20250HB1331PN2389 - 410 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IMPROVEMENT PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(QQQQ) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A MIXED-USE DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING HOUSING, RETAIL, CHILDCARE SERVICES AND A COMMUNITY EDUCATION CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(RRRR) CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE E.W. RHODES SCHOOL POOL RENOVATIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(SSSS) CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE WORK-TO-RIDE STABLESPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(TTTT) CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SHULER RECREATION CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 850,000(UUUU) SITE PREPARATION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION, REHABILITATION, EXPANSION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ENHANCEMENT AND BUILD OUT OF A WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT CENTER ALONG THE NORTH BROAD STREET CORRIDORPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(VVVV) CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 411 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENVIRONMENTAL AND/OR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL ASSESSMENT AND REMEDIATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO ENERGY, TRANSPORTATION, PARKING AND COMMON AREAS, AS WELL AS SPECIALIZED BUILDING AND STRUCTURAL COSTS RELATED TO THE INTENDED END USE OF ANY NEW STRUCTURES TO BE LOCATED AT THE SITE OR SITES WHERE BUILDING 16 IN THE PHILADELPHIA NAVY YARD WAS ALL OR PARTLY LOCATEDPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(WWWW) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR HOUSING PROJECTS AS PART OF A COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION PLANPROJECT ALLOCATION 200,000,000(XXXX) CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR OASIS MANOR SENIOR HOUSINGPROJECT ALLOCATION 7,500,000(YYYY) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE EXPANSION OF FOOD PACKING AND DELIVERY FOR CHARITABLE FOOD DISTRIBUTIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 412 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ZZZZ) INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT MANTUA HAVERFORD COMMUNITY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(A5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE FRANKFORD AFFORDABLE HOUSING MIXED-USE PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,000,000(B5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT THE EASTWICK REC CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(C5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, RENOVATION AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES AT THE MARIAN ANDERSON REC CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,500,000(D5) DESIGN, DEMOLITION AND DECONSTRUCTION OF DECOMMISSIONED EQUIPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, EXTENSIONS OR UPGRADING OF UTILITIES, SITE GRADING, FACADE PRESERVATION, FIT-OUT OF EXISTING SPACE, INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES, STORM WATER MANAGEMENT, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW 20250HB1331PN2389 - 413 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPACE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED BY MARKET STREET, 23RD STREET, 24TH STREET AND LUDLOW STREET, INCLUDING ADJACENT LOTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 9,000,000(E5) CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS AT BELMONT MANSIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 1,500,000(F5) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE MILL PROJECTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CECIL B. MOORE LIBRARYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(H5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR THE CREATION OF COMMUNITY RECREATION SPACE AT PENN ALEXANDERPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(I5) RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADES TO THE LIGUORI ACADEMY EDUCATION CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 17,000,000(J5) RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 414 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE LIGUORI COMMUNITY INNOVATION CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,000,000(K5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR STRUCTURAL AND ELECTRICAL UPGRADES AT RIVERSIDE MATERIALS, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 1,900,000(L5) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN OSHUN FAMILY CENTER FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(M5) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF A STUDENT ACTIVITIES CENTER AT NAZARETH ACADEMY HIGH SCHOOLPROJECT ALLOCATION 4,000,000(52) Pike County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the Pike County HospitalProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Acquisition, site development, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, equipment and other 20250HB1331PN2389 - 415 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related costs for a career and technical centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(ii) Dingman Township(A) Site preparation, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for NJY Camps facilitiesProject Allocation 5,500,000(B) Security infrastructure, planning, construction, equipment and related costs for NJY CampsProject Allocation 500,000(iii) Lackawaxen Township(A) Construction, site improvement, infrastructure, environmental remediation, redevelopment and other related costs for the For Pete's Sake cancer respite center at WoodlochProject Allocation 15,000,000(53) Potter County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, infrastructure, construction and other related costs for a health care facility that will provide maternal care, including childbirth servicesProject Allocation 10,000,000(54) Schuylkill County(i) County projects20250HB1331PN2389 - 416 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of an agricultural community and or economic development project in Schuylkill CountyProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Acquisition, design, demolition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs, including machinery and equipment, for a project at the Hazleton Area School DistrictProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN SCHUYLKILL COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR COMMUNITY ASSET PROJECT IN 20250HB1331PN2389 - 417 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHUYLKILL COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR BLUE MOUNTAIN SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(F) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR NORTH SCHUYLKILL SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(G) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR THE ORWIGSBURG FIRE DEPARTMENTPROJECT ALLOCATION 3,000,000(H) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 418 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR SHENANDOAH VALLEY SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(ii) CAN DO, Inc.(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for the CrossRoads East economic development project and surrounding lands in East Union TownshipProject Allocation 15,000,000(iii) Schuylkill County Industrial Development Authority(A) Site preparation, acquisition, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development project of the former Ashland State Hospital in Ashland, Schuylkill County Project Allocation 15,000,000(B) Site preparation, renovation, building construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development project in Highridge Business Park, Lot 6 in Cass TownshipProject Allocation 2,500,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 419 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Site preparation, renovation, building construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development project in Highridge Business Park, Lot 12 in Foster TownshipProject Allocation 7,500,000(D) Site preparation, renovation, construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for an economic development project at Keystone Potato Products facility in Frailey TownshipProject Allocation 35,000,000(E) Site preparation, renovation, demolition, building construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development project in Schuylkill Haven BoroughProject Allocation 7,500,000(F) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other associated costs for the construction and expansion of the 20250HB1331PN2389 - 420 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Kowalonek's Kielbasy ShopProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) Site preparation, renovation, building construction, redevelopment, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other associated costs for a community and/or economic development project in Frackville Industrial Park, West Mahanoy and Ryan Townships, Schuylkill CountyProject Allocation 7,500,000(iv) Hubley Township(A) Acquisition, site preparation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of an agricultural community and or economic development project in Schuylkill CountyProject Allocation 15,000,000(55) Snyder County (Reserved)(56) Somerset County (Reserved)(57) Sullivan County (Reserved)(58) Susquehanna County (Reserved)(59) Tioga County (Reserved)(59) TIOGA COUNTY(I) GRAND CANYON AIRPORT AUTHORITY(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR TERMINAL AREA AND AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING SAFETY 20250HB1331PN2389 - 421 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IMPROVEMENTS TO INFRASTRUCTURE AND DEVELOPMENT FOR NEW OPPORTUNITIES TO ACCOMMODATE THE GROWING INTEREST IN AVIATION AT HIGH SCHOOLSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(60) Union County(i) County projects(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure and other related costs for economic development projects in the countyProject Allocation 20,000,000(61) Venango County (Reserved)(62) Warren County (Reserved)(63) Washington County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN WASHINGTON COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A COMMUNITY ASSET 20250HB1331PN2389 - 422 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT IN WASHINGTON COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(i) (II) Redevelopment Authority of the County of Washington(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with Washington-East Washington Joint Authority projects in the City of WashingtonProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Washington & Jefferson College Facilities expansion and renovation and football stadium in the City of WashingtonProject Allocation 30,000,000(ii) (III) Peters Township(A) Construction, renovation and other related costs to rehabilitate the Peters Lake dam, including armoring the breastworks of the dam with a nonerosive treatment to comply with current regulationsProject Allocation 3,850,000(B) Acquisition, construction, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 423 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials and/or related costs for a redevelopment projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(IV) ROBINSON TOWNSHIP(A) INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND DEVELOPMENT OF A CAMPUS FOR RESCUING AND TRAINING OF MEDICAL SERVICE DOGS FOR MILITARY VETERANS, FIRST RESPONDERS AND CITIZENS WITH DISABILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(64) Wayne County(i) Greater Honesdale Partnership(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and/or other costs related to improvements to the Main Street corridor in Honesdale BoroughProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Berlin Township(A) Construction, infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for a first responders' training centerProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Prompton Borough(A) Construction, renovation, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 424 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, redevelopment and other related costs for park improvementProject Allocation 750,000(iv) Texas Township(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, redevelopment, renovation and/or other related costs for an economic development projectProject Allocation 3,000,000(65) Westmoreland County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (I.1) Redevelopment Authority of the County of Westmoreland(A) Acquisition, construction, redevelopment, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs to adaptively reuse a building in the City of GreensburgProject Allocation 500,000(ii) Latrobe Industrial Development Authority(A) Construction, renovation, redevelopment, infrastructure 20250HB1331PN2389 - 425 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvements, capital improvements and related costs for facilities on the campus of Saint Vincent College in LatrobeProject Allocation 10,000,000(II.1) WESTMORELAND COUNTY INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION(A) CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE IMPROVEMENTS, ROOF REPLACEMENTS, POSSIBLE ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATION/REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT RELATING TO THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE FORMER ALCOA MANUFACTURING FACILITY LOCATED IN THE CITIES OF ARNOLD AND NEW KENSINGTONPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(II.2) WESTMORELAND COUNTY REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A FACILITY TO HOUSE A MEDICAL SCHOOL FOR THE LAKE ERIE COLLEGE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE (LECOM)PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER 20250HB1331PN2389 - 426 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED COSTS FOR A HOTEL AND CONFERENCE FACILITY IN HEMPFIELD TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II.3) CITY OF GREENSBURG(A) CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, RESTORATION, REPLACEMENT, PRESERVATION, INSTALLATION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF NEW AND EXISTING FACILITIES AT THE WESTMORELAND MUSEUM OF AMERICAN ARTPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,500,000(B) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, RENOVATION, REHABILITATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE SETON HILL UNIVERSITY CAMPUS.PROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(II.4) NEW STANTON BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, SITE PREPARATION, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT AND OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE CENTRAL WESTMORELAND CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CENTERPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(iii) East Huntingdon Township(A) Redevelopment, construction, site and 20250HB1331PN2389 - 427 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure improvements, roof replacements, renovations, rehabilitation and other related costs for an economic development project at the Westmoreland Innovation facilityProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Construction, site and infrastructure improvements and other related costs for the development of a state-of-the-art transportation testing facility at the Westmoreland Innovation facilityProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Hempfield Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Hempfield Area School District expansion and renovationProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Hempfield Township Conference and Community Center ProjectProject Allocation 30,000,000(v) New Stanton Borough(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 428 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Central Westmoreland Career and Technology CenterProject Allocation 20,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR DEVELOPMENT OF MODERN SPORT, CULTURAL AND RECREATIONAL FACILITIESPROJECT ALLOCATION 11,900,000(vi) (V) North Huntingdon Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Norwin School District expansion and renovationProject Allocation 30,000,000(vii) (VI) Penn Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Penn Township Municipal Complex, emergency services building and community centerProject Allocation 20,000,000(viii) (VII) Rostraver Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 429 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Rostraver Township expansion and renovations of facilities, municipal complex and emergency servicesProject Allocation 20,000,000(ix) (VIII) Unity Township(A) Acquisition, renovation, infrastructure, site preparation, construction, redevelopment, abatement and other costs associated with the Unity Township expansion and renovations of facilities, municipal complex and emergency servicesProject Allocation 15,000,000(IX) UPPER BURRELL TOWNSHIP(A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENT OF FACILITIES TO SUPPORT GROWTH IN PRODUCTION VOLUMES AND JOBS FOR ARCONIC, INC.PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(66) Wyoming County (Reserved)(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT 20250HB1331PN2389 - 430 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR LACKAWANNA TRAIL SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DESIGN, DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS, INCLUDING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT, FOR A PROJECT FOR TUNKHANNOCK AREA SCHOOL DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 2,000,000(67) York County(I) COUNTY PROJECTS(A) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT AND/OR HISTORIC PRESERVATION OF BUILDINGS AND/OR STRUCTURES LOCATED WITHIN A DOWNTOWN AREA IN ONE OR MORE OF YORK COUNTY'S BOROUGHS OR THE CITY OF YORKPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MODERNIZATION AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF MUNICIPAL BUILDINGS, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 431 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARKS AND/OR OTHER MUNICIPAL-OWNED SITES(S) WITHIN YORK COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(C) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR NEW DEVELOPMENT OR REDEVELOPMENT OF AN EXISTING PUBLIC EDUCATION CENTER TO IMPROVE FACILITIES AND ENHANCE CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES TO BETTER IMPROVE THE SKILLED WORKFORCE PIPELINE IN YORK COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(D) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE MODERNIZATION, EXPANSION OR CREATION OF NEW OR EXISTING MANUFACTURING FACILITIES IN YORK COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(E) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR NONPROFIT REDEVELOPMENT, MODERNIZATION AND SERVICE ENHANCEMENTS THROUGHOUT YORK COUNTYPROJECT ALLOCATION 12,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 432 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR YORK COUNTY LIBRARY SYSTEM PROJECTSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(G) A CAPITAL PROJECT WITHIN THE TRAIL TOWN COMMUNITIES OF YORK CITY, SEVEN VALLEYS, GLEN ROCK, RAILROAD, NEW FREEDOM, HANOVER OR WRIGHTSVILLE, THAT WILL EXPAND THE TRAIL TOWNS ASSET DEVELOPMENT TO ENHANCE VISITOR EXPERIENCE, ADAPTIVE REUSE OF A HISTORIC PROPERTY OR ENHANCED CONNECTIVITY TO THE HERITAGE RAIL TRAILPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(H) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS FOR A YORK COLLEGE OF PA FACILITY DEVELOPMENT OR EXPANSIONPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(I) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT AT THE FORMER METSO MINERALS SITE20250HB1331PN2389 - 433 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(J) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OR EXPANSION OF A MANUFACTURING FACILITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(K) CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE AND OTHER RELATED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT NEEDS FOR A CURRENT OR FORMER HIGHER EDUCATION CAMPUSPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(i) (I.1) Susquehanna Area Regional Airport Authority(A) Abatement of hazardous materials, site work, construction, renovations and other costs associated for economic development of business and aviation facilities and infrastructure at Capital City Airport in Fairview TownshipProject Allocation 2,500,000(ii) York County Economic Alliance(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, redevelopment, renovation, abatement of hazardous materials, machinery and equipment and other related costs for the Steam Into 20250HB1331PN2389 - 434 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 History rail line extension projectProject Allocation 7,500,000(B) Acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, construction, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for the modernization, expansion or creation of new or existing manufacturing facilities in York CountyProject Allocation 8,000,000(C) Acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, construction, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for the modernization, expansion or creation of new or existing business operations in York CountyProject Allocation 8,000,000(D) Acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, construction, abatement of hazardous materials and other related costs for the restoration and reuse of a property in Hanover BoroughProject Allocation 20,000,000(E) Acquisition, redevelopment, renovation, construction, abatement of hazardous materials and/or other related costs for capital improvements to expand Able Services' ability to serve individuals with intellectual disabilities in York County20250HB1331PN2389 - 435 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(II.1) CITY OF YORK(A) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RESTORATION AND REUSE OF PROPERTY LOCATED WITHIN THE CITY OF YORKPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(II.2) HANOVER BOROUGH(A) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND ABATEMENT OF HISTORIC DOWNTOWN PROPERTY FOR ADAPTIVE REUSE TO COMPLEMENT DOWNTOWN HANOVERPROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,000(iii) Dover Township(A) Construction, acquisition, site improvement, infrastructure, environmental remediation, redevelopment and/or other related costs for a community or economic development projectProject Allocation 8,000,000(B) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, INFRASTRUCTURE, ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A COMMUNITY OR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN DOVER TOWNSHIP20250HB1331PN2389 - 436 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(iv) Spring Garden Township(A) Construction, site improvement, infrastructure, environmental remediation, redevelopment and other related costs to construct a new fire and rescue service station in Spring Garden TownshipProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Acquisition, site preparation, environmental remediation, construction, rehabilitation and renovation activities related to the development of a community and/or economic development project in Spring Garden TownshipProject Allocation 10,000,000(V) WEST MANCHESTER TOWNSHIP(A) ACQUISITION, REDEVELOPMENT, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, INSTALLATION OF NECESSARY MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT AND/OR OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS TO MAINTAIN OR EXPAND OPERATIONS AT MAGNESITA REFRACTORIES COMPANY OPERATIONS IN WEST MANCHESTER TOWNSHIPPROJECT ALLOCATION 8,000,000(68) Multiple counties(I) ALLEGHENY AND WASHINGTON COUNTIES20250HB1331PN2389 - 437 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) SITE PREPARATION, REMEDIATION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, RENOVATIONS, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR UPGRADING ALLEGHENY VALLEY RAILROAD INFRASTRUCTUREPROJECT ALLOCATION 13,500,000(i) (I.1) Berks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(A) Acquisition, construction, infrastructure, rehabilitation and other related costs for renovations or upgrades to existing Greater Philadelphia YMCA facilities and new YMCA facilitiesProject Allocation 70,000,000(I.2) CARBON, LACKAWANNA, LUZERNE, MONROE, PIKE, SCHUYLKILL AND WAYNE COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT, REHABILITATION, MODERNIZATION, ENERGY UPGRADES, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR THE NEW CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENT FOR VALUE-ADDED BUSINESS, MANUFACTURING, NONPROFIT, RECREATIONAL, TOURISM RELATED FACILITIES THAT ARE PART OF THE NORTHEASTERN PENNSYLVANIA 20250HB1331PN2389 - 438 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALLIANCE'S COMPREHENSIVE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STRATEGYPROJECT ALLOCATION 25,000,000(ii) Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Construction, infrastructure, renovation, rehabilitation and other related costs for restoration of passenger rail service and improvement to tourist and freight trainsProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) ACQUISITION, DEMOLITION, SITE WORK, REMEDIATION, RENOVATION, CONSTRUCTION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS AT CHEYNEY UNIVERSITYPROJECT ALLOCATION 5,000,000(II.1) CHESTER, DELAWARE, MONTGOMERY AND PHILADELPHIA COUNTIES(A) CONSTRUCTION, ACQUISITION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR A BIOTRANSFORMER PROJECT TO CONVERT FOOD WASTE TO ESSENTIAL COMPONENTS OF PHARMACEUTICALSPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(iii) Pike and Wayne Counties(A) Acquisition, construction, demolition, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure and other related costs for the development of a career and technical educational 20250HB1331PN2389 - 439 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 schoolProject Allocation 20,000,000(IV) ADAMS, CUMBERLAND, FRANKLIN, LANCASTER AND YORK COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES TO DELIVER MEDICAL SERVICES, CONDUCT RESEARCH, PROVIDE MEDICAL EDUCATION AND OTHER RELATED ACTIVITIES FOR WELLSPAN HEALTH AND ITS AFFILIATESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(V) BERKS, BUCKS, CARBON, LACKAWANNA, LEHIGH, LUZERNE, MONROE, MONTGOMERY, NORTHAMPTON AND SCHUYLKILL COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES TO DELIVER MEDICAL SERVICES, CONDUCT RESEARCH, PROVIDE MEDICAL EDUCATION AND OTHER RELATED ACTIVITIES FOR JEFFERSON HEALTH LEHIGH VALLEY HEALTH SYSTEM AND ITS AFFILIATESPROJECT ALLOCATION 30,000,000(VI) CENTRE, COLUMBIA, CUMBERLAND, DAUPHIN, LACKAWANNA, LUZERNE, MIFFLIN, MONTOUR AND 20250HB1331PN2389 - 440 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES TO DELIVER MEDICAL SERVICES, CONDUCT RESEARCH, PROVIDE MEDICAL EDUCATION AND OTHER RELATED ACTIVITIES FOR GEISINGER HEALTH AND ITS AFFILIATESPROJECT ALLOCATION 15,000,000(VII) CENTRE, COLUMBIA, LACKAWANNA, LUZERNE, LYCOMING, MIFFLIN, MONTOUR, NORTHUMBERLAND, SCHUYLKILL, SNYDER AND UNION COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATION, ABATEMENT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR FACILITIES TO DELIVER MEDICAL SERVICES, CONDUCT RESEARCH, PROVIDE MEDICAL EDUCATION, AND OTHER RELATED ACTIVITIES FOR GEISINGER AND ITS AFFILIATESPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000(VIII) LEHIGH, NORTHAMPTON AND BUCKS COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, INFRASTRUCTURE, REHABILITATION AND OTHER RELATED COSTS FOR RENOVATIONS OR UPGRADES TO EXISTING RIVER CROSSING YMCA FACILITIES AND NEW YMCA FACILITIES20250HB1331PN2389 - 441 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROJECT ALLOCATION 50,000,000(IX) PHILADELPHIA AND MONTGOMERY COUNTIES(A) ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, INFRASTRUCTURE, CONSTRUCTION, REDEVELOPMENT AND OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS NEAR CITY AVENUE AND THE CITY AVENUE SPECIAL SERVICES DISTRICTPROJECT ALLOCATION 20,000,000Section 7. Itemization of flood control projects.Additional capital projects in the category of flood control projects to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Core Creek Dam, Bucks County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 3,300,000(ii) Thatcher Run Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,000(iii) Rainbow Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Kintz Creek Dam, Pike County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 442 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Hamilton Dam, Tioga County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 3,900,000(vi) Flat Rock Dam, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(A) Dredging of Flat Rock DamProject Allocation 100,000,000(2) (Reserved)Section 8. Itemization of Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission capital projects.Capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or developed by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by the current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorizations are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal Project Allocation(1) Fish and Boat Commission(i) Fisheries Area 6 Office, Bucks County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(ii) Bellefonte State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 443 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(iii) Benner Spring State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation3,400,000(iv) Pleasant Gap State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructure20250HB1331PN2389 - 444 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation7,500,000(v) Spring Creek Canyon Trail, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a two-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation2,800,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate, remove or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation500,000(C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a one-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation2,200,000(vi) Kahle Lake, Clarion and Venango Counties (A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(vii) Tylersville State Fish Hatchery, 20250HB1331PN2389 - 445 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Clinton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation8,000,000(viii) Huntsdale State Fish Hatchery, Cumberland County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation26,500,000(B) Design, permit and construct facilities for the remediation of PCB contaminated soils and monitor environmental remediationsProject Allocation7,500,000(ix) Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties to construct fish rearing and research facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructure for the acquisition and development of the Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, or for the expansion and development of 20250HB1331PN2389 - 446 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 another fish rearing facility in Erie CountyProject Allocation25,000,000(x) North East Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct new or rehabilitate existing infrastructure to support a day use/seasonal public access area and boat launchProject Allocation18,000,000(xi) Trout Run Steel Head Collection Facility, Erie County(A) Design, permit, construct, rehabilitate or improve fish collection facilities and related infrastructure and demolition of existing in-stream concrete structures, retaining walls and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000PROJECT ALLOCATION 7,000,000(xii) Union City State Fish Hatchery AQUATIC CONSERVANCY CENTER, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation2,500,000PROJECT ALLOCATION 10,000,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 447 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xiii) Walnut Creek Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct or rehabilitate marina-related infrastructure to improve slip capacity, parking and boating and fishing accessProject Allocation12,000,000(xiv) Maintenance Area 1/Fisheries Area 2 Office, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xv) Tionesta State Fish Hatchery, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(xvi) Hemlock Lake, Indiana County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at Hemlock Lake20250HB1331PN2389 - 448 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation2,000,000(xvii) Cloe Lake, Jefferson County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation8,500,000(xviii) Fords Lake, Lackawanna County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xix) Harris Pond, Luzerne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xx) Minsi Lake, Northampton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties 20250HB1331PN2389 - 449 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construct, rehabilitate or replace a bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,200,000(xxi) Oswayo State Fish Hatchery, Potter County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation6,500,000(xxii) High Point Lake, Somerset County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at High Point LakeProject Allocation2,000,000(xxiii) Hunters Lake, Sullivan County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary20250HB1331PN2389 - 450 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation1,500,000(xxiv) Fisheries Area 5 Office, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xxv) Miller Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at Miller PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxvi) Pleasant Mount State Fish Hatchery, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation9,500,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace bridges, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,600,00020250HB1331PN2389 - 451 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(xxvii) White Oak Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at White Oak PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxviii) Polk/Sandy Creek bridge removal, Venango County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or remove an abandoned railroad bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,500,000(2) (Reserved)Section 9. Debt authorization.(a) Public improvements.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money 20250HB1331PN2389 - 452 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(a).(b) Furniture and equipment.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(b) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in the capital budget.(c) Transportation assistance.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(c) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(d) Redevelopment assistance.--Subject to the limitations in section 2.1 of the act of May 29, 2020 (P.L.205, No.25), known as the Capital Budget Act of 2019-2020, the Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(d) as may be found necessary to carry out 20250HB1331PN2389 - 453 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the redevelopment assistance capital projects specifically itemized in the capital budget.(e) Flood control.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(e) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(f) Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission projects.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate specified in section 2(f) to carry out the acquisition and construction of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.Section 10. Issue of bonds.The indebtedness authorized in this act shall be incurred from time to time and shall be evidenced by one or more series of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth in such aggregate principal amount for each series as the Governor, the Auditor General and the State Treasurer shall determine, but the latest stated maturity date shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the projects being financed as stated in section 11.Section 11. Estimated useful life and term of debt.20250HB1331PN2389 - 454 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Estimated useful life.--The General Assembly states that the estimated useful life of the capital projects itemized in this act is as follows:(1) Public improvement projects, 30 years.(2) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(3) Transportation assistance projects:(i) Rolling stock, 15 years.(ii) Passenger buses, 12 years.(iii) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(iv) All others, 30 years.(4) Redevelopment assistance projects, 30 years.(b) Term of debt.--The maximum term of the debt authorized to be incurred under this act is 30 years.Section 12. Appropriations.(a) Public improvements.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(a) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the public improvement projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(b) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition 20250HB1331PN2389 - 455 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(c) Transportation assistance.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Transportation in the maximum amount specified in section 2(c) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Transportation the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(d) Redevelopment assistance.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development in the maximum amount specified in section 2(d) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the redevelopment assistance capital projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Community and Economic Development the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(e) Flood control.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection in the maximum amount specified in section 2(e) to be 20250HB1331PN2389 - 456 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Environmental Protection the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.Section 13. Federal funds.(a) Projects itemized in this act.--All money received from the Federal Government for the projects specifically itemized in this act are also hereby appropriated for those projects.(b) Projects not requiring itemization.--Department of Military and Veterans Affairs construction projects which are totally federally funded and to be administered by the Department of General Services are hereby authorized.Section 14. Editorial changes.In editing and preparing this act for printing following the final enactment, the Legislative Reference Bureau shall insert or revise letters or numbers for projects where the letters or numbers are missing or require revision. The Legislative Reference Bureau shall also revise the total monetary amounts for the total authorization, debt authorization, appropriations and department totals as necessary to agree with the total monetary amounts of the projects.Section 15. Delegation.Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of General Services may delegate the design and construction of the projects contained in:(1) Section 3(1)(i) of this act to The Pennsylvania State University.(2) Section 3(1)(iii) of this act to the University of 20250HB1331PN2389 - 457 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania.(3) Section 3(a)(1)(ii)(B) of the act of November 1, 2013 (P.L.680, No.85), known as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2013-2014, to the University of Pennsylvania.Section 16. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1331PN2389 - 458 - 1234567